
                   Very helpful and friendly guy.  Relates to the students well.
                
                   He teaches from power point. Poor involvement in classes. Does not inspire you nor does he engage you. Certainly not for anyone that needs an active teacher. Decent exams with good notes (from PowerPoint). Hard class projects which count too much.
                
                   One of the best classes I have taken, great teacher, cares about his students and their success, if you go talk to him he will help you.
                
                   Great teacher.  Great lectures.  Tough but fair.
                
                   Explains accounting very well, tests are challenging but he prepares his class.
                
                   Really sweet. Straight to the point. Tries to make it interesting.
                
                   Cooley is a great teacher who is always willing to help you out!
                
                   Absolutely loved having Cooley! As long as you study what is on the review and the chapter outlines that we go over in class, the tests aren't bad! 
                
                   This course is very tough, its intermediate accounting for pete's sake. Just show up to class, use her notes and write anything extra you think you would forget. make sure to study for tests and just make sure to take it one step at a time. Karen is never going to turn you down if you need help and she will explain any questions you have!
                
                   This teacher is a goofball and just the sweetest funny lady. she will help you in any way she can and understands that her students are people and genuinely wants to do anything in her power to help you! Plus she makes the material seem SO  simple!
                
                   Prof. Cooley is hands down one the best professors I've had at WT. She is so nice and understanding. She is one of those professors that you can tell really cares about the students and will work with you. If you are not an accounting major but need to take accounting 1 and 2, make sure you take her.
                
                   Karen Cooley is one of the best teachers I have EVER had. She cares about each one of her students, and really takes into consideration that accounting isn't for everyone and really teaches accordingly. If you're not an accounting major, don't take anyone else!
                
                   Cooley is a phenomenal teacher!  Very interested in each individual student, incredibly helpful.  Love her!
                
                   She's a really good professor.  Take her! :)
                
                   Really good intro professor.
                
                   She is an amazing professor and advisor. She is hard, but you will learn. She is extremely helpful and will talk you through anything.
                
                   Na
                
                   Best teacher I ever had. She really cares about her students and that can help out your grade A LOT. She has helped students by letting them take their tests at later days when they are sick, etc. TAKE HER!!! :)
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Karen worked with me to insure I understood the material. I got sick during the last test and she took it up and just graded what I had finished. Most teachers wouldn't do that for a student.
                
                   Awesome teacher...really cares about her students...extremely helpful...but you must study if you want to pass this course!
                
                   Great teacher!! She was funny and made it so much easier to pay attention. The class was pretty easy as long as you studied. 
                
                   not a good choice to take if you want to be taught, not just expected to teach yourself out of the book- which is very expensive. this should be an online class because all assignments are online & she does not teach or help in class but expects you to be there for attendance, test are hard and are not like anything you work on in class or online.
                
                   She is a cool teacher and is willing to joke around in class. But be warned Auditing is about as boring Tax. Also it is nearly as hard and the book is horrible. Other than that Dr. Friske makes the class rather enjoyable.
                
                   The format for the class was fair and helpful.  The quizzes were hard but you get a couple days to do them and then can review them in preparation for the timed exams.  She was veryprompt in answering questions and gave good explanations.  She was also very reasonable if you missed an exam.
                
                   The MPA Ethics class was by far the most interesting and fun class I took in the whole time I was in the program. There were writing assignments each week but no exams.  Discussions were really interesting!
                
                   A very challenging class due to the amount and depth of material covered.  Lazy students need to avoid this class.  However, Dr. Kreissl was a very prepared teacher, clear in her lectures, and very helpful outside of class.  Exams were challenging but fair.  Don't wait till the night before to try and do the comprehensive problems.
                
                   Just this year, guidelines for this class has changed. It is hard, and Dr. Kreissl doesn't really help in making the transition easier.  Tests are hard, and the only way to do well is to read the 1000+ page book.   Don't take her if you can avoid it.
                
                   This lady loves to teach.  Her classes are informative and as fun as an accounting class can be.  Exams are multiple choice but don't think that makes them easy. Tests on what is emphasized in classes.  Lots of group in-class bonus point opportunities.
                
                   Mr. Stampfly is an awesome teacher. The material is tough, but he makes it easy to understand. When you come to class he has all of his lecture notes printed out so you don't have to use the book except for homework. His notes are clear save lots of time digging through the book. He cares about his students and relates to them well.
                
                   Excellent teacher.  Has notes ready for you to use, and has his lectures down.  He explains things in a very understandable way.  The subject matter is hard and there is a lot of it, so be prepared to work !!
                
                   Great teacher.  Loved his course, can't wait for part II.
                
                   Good professor, he is tough but he grades fairly.  And he actually cares about his students.
                
                   This is one of the hardest classes business majors have to take. There are 4 tests, including a cumulative final, quizzes, and a group project. The exams are hard, and she only curved the final. She knows what she's talking about, but she has a hard time understanding that her students have never seen the material before.
                
                   Mrs. Barrett is great! She goes at a nice pace explaining the material and is very thorough. Takes a lot of studying, but tests are fair. 
                
                   This class is not an easy A but getting an A is definitely possible. Take advantage of the practice problems on her website and the help desk when it comes to quizzes and work outside of class. If you put in the time and go to class you will get a good grade
                
                   The course is hard but she is a good prof that will work with you. Definately better than the other options
                
                   She's ok.
                
                   I took the course with her this summer, and really enjoyed it. It was very tough, and def a hard class. But if you put in the work it's not that bad, really! I made an A on every test except for the second one, I made a B. I would suggest taking the course in the summer rather than regular semesters. Tara is great! Good teaching style!
                
                   She is very nice and easy to talk to and she really cares about your success.  The class is just hard overall, she has the highest Q-drop tho so I think i would have done better with another teacher but still a really good one.
                
                   Awesome prof- sucky class
                
                   Nice lady, really funny and helpful at times. If you don't do the recommended 10+ hours of studyinghomework a week, your grade will be wrecked. She essentially sets up her class to where you teach yourself the basics (which are still pretty hard) and she covers the more complex material in class as well as answering questions. Tests are VERY hard.
                
                   She only uses the class time to answer questions and let you compare your homework with your classmates'  . there is no difference if you take the class online.+the material itself is extremely hard.
                
                   Shannon is the bomb!
                
                   Super easy. Take her and she will let you into the PPA for free.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Class requires work for a good grade. Attendance is not mandatory but it would be very hard to do well without going. Josephy is very helpful. He works through a lot of problems and is very clear with requirements. He made lectures interesting and is very friendly. He really cares about his students.I would definitely recommend him for 229.
                
                   TAKE MRS. KNOOP IF AT ALL POSSIBLE FOR 229!!!  She truly cares about her students and there is no reason to feel nervous if you go talk to her.  Go to class, do the hw and quizzes, and ask for help when you need it.  You will receive whatever grade you earn based on the amount of time an effort you put in.  I'm a marketing & terrible at math, too.
                
                   AMAZING PROF! She genuinely cares for her students and says she is our mom. She explains things really well and puts things in terms we understand. She is more than willing to help if you ask for it. Not gonna lie the class is hard and you have to work for it but with her its totally manageable. Definitely take her!!
                
                   The absolute best professor ive ever had. Shes thoughtful, clear and genuinely enjoys her job and cares about the students. She was super supportive with both class and personal endeavors and offered nothing but help whenever asked. She doesnt like texting in class which really isnt much to ask. Dont miss class or youll fall behind. TAKE HER!
                
                   Even though they say Acct 229 is hard, Ms. Knoop just constantly finds ways to make it easier. There are 3 tests and a final (100 each) that most students will earn between a 83-93. There is a built in 100 points curve if you do the homework (9 problems - that the TA give the answers) that she gives every two weeks. Def Take her
                
                   She was great! Very nice and helpful.
                
                   AWESOME prof!! She will teach you everything you need to know, just make sure to go to class.
                
                   take her for accounting if you can, the best there is.
                
                   I had her as my Honors Acct 230 professor and I very much regret taking this class as an honors course. Your grade mostly consists of exams, which are difficult, and a project, which is VERY time-consuming. Her teaching methods were all over the place and usually fast-paced. It was difficult to really grasp the material, even after asking questions
                
                   Attendance isn't mandatory, but I strongly suggest going to class. She sometimes has difficulty explaining the material to students and works fairly fast, but is willing to slow down and explain further. She is entertaining in class, and enjoys talking to students. Tests aren't too hard if you do the online practice problems. Should be an A or a B.
                
                   I took McGowan for Honors Accounting 230. I often had a hard time following her in class. Be prepared to teach yourself outside of class. That being said, she's really nice and funny. She makes sure that there's a certain level of As and Bs in her classes so don't be too worried about making the grades if you don't do well on the first test.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Absolutely fantastic prof. Far and away my favorite I've had at the university. She cares so much and will do anything to make sure her students understand the material. The class is difficult, but the lectures breeze by because she makes it interesting and is enthusiastic.
                
                   Easily one of the best instructors I've ever had. April has a quality that in my opinion makes a class miles easier - SHE ACTUALLY CARES ABOUT YOU! You won't find a more caring and enthusiastic prof.
                
                   I loved this professor. She is such a great person and really tries to make this class interesting for all of her students.
                
                   She is very personable and gives you as much help as you need. She values making connections with her students. Honestly, I think the coursework is not very interesting, so, without her, I probably would have slept through the class.
                
                   Dr. Ray turned out to be a better professor than I originally thought he would be. He gave the class a book to read to help with acct principles, even though is was dumbed down a little bit and more of a story than anything, but read it. Pop quizzes come from the book and it's easy IF you read. Tests are eh, STUDY EVERYTHING (terms included).
                
                   Accounting is tough but Ray is a great professor. He is not always clear when explaining the subject matter but is always willing to go over anything you ask. He is very big on participation and class discussion, and he also distributes pop quizzes, so attendance is important (but not mandatory). Great prof but I can't say I'd take the course again
                
                   Accounting 229 is tough regardless of the professor, but Dr. Ray turned out to be a great, funny professor. He was always willing to help in office hours and in class. Be sure to read the novel, because that is what your pop quizzes are over! Tests are difficult, but that's across the board for 229 so go to the reviews and study hard!
                
                   You must study if you want to consider passing his class. The in class (pop) quizzes are over a separate book that he wrote, they aren't too difficult if you read the book. He does curve at the end of the semester, and he has plenty of extr credit "quiz" at the end of the semester to help your grade. I would recommend taking his class if you ever
                
                   Dr. Ray is a great professor. He is very smart and has an interesting background that makes him extremely qualified to teach this class. 229 is a tough course regardless of professor but Dr. Ray does what he can to help you out. He knows every student's name and does care about the performance of students.  I would take another acct course from him
                
                   She words everything so weird it is hard to understand what she is asking sometimes. 
                
                   Great Professor, willing to answer any question. Expect weekly quizzes, but her quizzes are really helpful to study for the test. 
                
                   The easiest accounting class i've taken!
                
                   She has got a personality and brings it every class. She really cares about her students. If you apply yourself, you should at the very least get a B. 
                
                   This class is an easy B if you put in minimal effort. She basically guarantees you a C by giving you homework that she provided the answers to before the homework is due. So the homework portion of the class is an easy 100 and she also builds in a curve from the beginning of class. Like I said, do everything you are supposed to and it's an easy B.
                
                   GO TO CLASS. It can be easy to skip class since the lectures are only once a week and she doesn't take attendance. She's very nice and not intimidating; she does a great job of teaching things and answering any questions you have.  One homework assignment a week, but she posts the answers. Class is curved, and sometimes gives extra credit.
                
                   She was always very willing to help me. Her class is pretty tough and the tests are complicated. The math is easy, but the concepts are more difficult to grasp. Sometimes she gets off topic, but she is always excited to be in class  and energizes the lectures. 
                
                   She is lovely and sweet. Course is part on the web part in class room, you have to do a lot of reading each week. There are weekly quizzes that discuss the materials reviewed on class. There are 4 tough exams, and an easy project. Sometimes she curves grades.
                
                   She is very sweet and truly cares about your grades. If you show that you are concerned she will not let you fail. The information is not easy and she doesn't teach the content well. Overall was much harder than I expected. Make sure you don't fall behind. If you get confused don't be scared to talk to her, she will help. DO NOT BUY THE TEXTBOOK!
                
                   Gets slightly off topic, but is overall a great teacher. If you pay attention, go to class, and study when necessary, then it is very possible to get an A. She is always up and lively, and get your attention that way. Great prof, who I would take again.
                
                   Great prof! She is beyond helpful and very easy going. The accounting material is difficult, but she is more than willing to help anyone. I would take another class of hers again. p.s. Don't bother buying the acct book.
                
                   This prof is soo boring at 8 am and her lectures are completely pointless and dumb. go to tutoring to make a C or B.
                
                   Great Prof! Very helpful and keeps it intersting! I would definately take her again!
                
                   This class only meets once a week 8am either T or TR and  you test on Monday nights 7-9pm. If you are an average student you will need to go to tutoring and the help desk. She gives a little extra credit but it's still hard to get an A or a B.
                
                   I had her in the morning, and she actually kept me awake. She's fun, but she has a tendency to get off topic.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I took her when she taught STAT 303 and the material was hard but she went over the homework every week in her class and was available for help.  I got like a 40 on my first test but with her help I still made a B. I would take her for any class.
                
                   pretty fair overall, not a bad teacher, i would take another course with her
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He was a great professor.  I really enjoyed his class, and he seemed to enjoy teaching it.  The class may have been difficult, but he helps you to really learn the material.
                
                   He's hard, but he's a great professor and nice man!
                
                   He literally gives lectures over problems which he just changes numbers for the tests. If you go to class this is an easy A. However the material is not easy. If you talk to him after class or in his office that will also help. Great guy and great Prof.
                
                   The guy doesnt know how to teach. However, hes very good at mumbling to himself as he writes on the overhead like he's in a race without regulations on legibility. SI leader was hot though, so it wasnt all bad...
                
                   Such a waste of money. Avoid this professor!
                
                   The worst professor in my career. I have two undergraduate degree and I never had such a bad professor. I hope Texas A&M doesn't continue affecting their reputation with Professor like that. She is not a bad person, However she is not a good professor.
                
                   A little difficult to listen to, but excellent professor.  She knows her subject, and she explains things thoroughly.  I'm  not sure how to interpret her ratings here, but they are very difficult to read, and probably shouldn't be taken too seriously.  She's a good professor!
                
                   The only thing I find annoying with her is her voice. It is monotone and borderline boring. If you are going to make lectures after lectures for us to listen to, please make it interesting so that we stay awake...
                
                   So bad professor and she has a cyclical problem. She doesn't care if you are trying to do your best. however, she want you to keep asking here about anything after the class and office hours. To feel important.She doesnt respect master student and deal with them like a high school student. IT was a big mistake when I took a course with here
                
                   Her saying always confuse. I don't know what she want to do. She give me a very lower grade with my essay which has already checked by writing center two times. She can not control the class when some businessmen talk about unrelated thing(at lease I think).
                
                   The worst class I've ever had. She is not sure about what she is saying. Moreover, she is really stingy with grades. Also, the class is super boring because she just reads the slides. Honestly, this instructor is horrible.
                
                   The class is super easy but with her was so so so so super HARED PLZ PLZ you should not take with her any class if u do you are going to get D she isnot good at all it was so so so time and class in my life
                
                   The class was super hard. I would seriously take another professor if I were you. She is not a good instructor at all, her tests are so hard. I seriously had the worst class in my entire life with her.
                
                   Most of the grading comes from the homework. Took 4 exams that were all easy A's.
                
                   I got behind in week one. He wouldn't let me make it up. He said I had the syllabus (which was not posted in advance!) It meant a fail. As it was he gave me a dropped failing which is EXACT to an F toward your GPA.
                
                   What I found out that none of these accounting professors were teaching in the real sense. I mean explaining the journal entries, why and if and others. None. I could sense why. Because they were on tenure. The money gone down the drain. What use is this if you study by yourself&#63; They don't explain I graduated with distinction learned nothing.
                
                   I took this online. Get ready to spend almost every night working on one of the 3-4 weekly assignments. If you get behind, you are toast. Feedback is minimal on written assignments, but majority of class is managed by Online Homework manager. HW, quizzes, and exams are pretty straight forward and follow the book exactly. Again, lot of work!
                
                   The guy is such a stickler for the rules that he misses the point that we are people with lives. I don't mean he doesn't tolerate drama queens. He believes if he could be there why in the world couldn't you!
                
                   Brutal on homework.  Nightmare from hell.  Be sure to quit your job and family before taking his nightmare classes.  He only gets harder in more advanced classes. Has gotten somewhat softer since older though. gives good curves on tests, unless there is someone getting straight a's.
                
                   Can be a lot of work. He uses HW Manager for the HW, Quizzes, and Exams. Put questions in the format he requests to get the best response. Take the practice quizzes!!!!!! HW Manager does have a few issues, however, he allows multiple attempts at the HW. Dr. C is aware of the HW Manager issues and is fair on the quizzes and exams.
                
                   Lots of work, but very fair.  Home work is the bulk (40%) of the grade and you have 5 attempts at every  HW assignment.  Some people complain but if you just do all the work it is very hard to get under a B.
                
                   I live in New Mexico and took the Internet course - a very well organized and intellectually challenging course, but Dr. Carmichael gave NO feedback on any of my coursework, even when I begged for it. I made an official complaint to the university. Came across as extremely rude, thoughtless, and did not seem to care about you or your work at all.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He gives hard exams and is rude to students but curves pretty good in the end.
                
                   Be totally prepared to study ALL on your own. This guy does NOT teach at all. Never willing to answer questions and treats students like they are dumb. We ask you questions because you are our TEAHCER!&#63; Why is he teaching if he doesn't care about the students&#63; Seems like he is trying to fail everyone here. SADLY HE IS ONLY TEACHER TEACHING TAX
                
                   Be prepared to work and learn.  This guy can help you with your future accting career if you listen and work.  He seems to be the only one that truly pushes students to their potential at TAMU-C!!
                
                   Not good!!!
                
                   hard but fair, any you will know the material when he is finnished teaching the class
                
                   The worst I have ever had
                
                   He is a very good professor for those seeking to become accountants.
                
                   Give him a break.  He is good for accountants.
                
                   Best Accounting professor for Accounting majors.
                
                   He is very nice.
                
                   O.k.
                
                   Ridiculously difficult exams and quizzes.  Quizzes are 20-30 minutes and involve crazy calculations.  The lectures are him ready straight off of powerpoint.  A majority of the answers on the test were suspect and many students contested their incorrect answers.  I would rather not take him again.  Positive is that the project was straight forward.
                
                   Prof. Carl is a perfect example of an online professor that just collects a check. He told  us up front he was much too busy in his personal life to record new live lectures for us so he just recycled old ones. He also required a new edition textbook but all of his materials were based on an old version (not good for a tax class).  Avoid this guy.
                
                   Take this Professor very laid back and will help you understand. He go over the assignment. Only thing his exams are long.
                
                   Professor Carl was very helpful and knowledgable. I loved the class and would reccomend it to anyone.
                
                   This class was Awesome!  The Professor really knows the subject and is responsive and interested in the students understanding the material.
                
                   Provides very little time for the quizzes/exams. Class live sessions to discuss homework is spent with him reading the answers without any work shown. This class is more theory and little working of taxes -- not at all what I expected.
                
                   I wish he would give more "hands on" quizzes/exams than a bunch of multiple choice and true/false tests.  They rarely measure a person's understanding.I'm more interested in knowing "how to" do taxes rather than my grade being based on if I know "which one of these is Not associated with..."  Only one hands on assignment for a grade is pathetic.
                
                   Awesome Professor. Responsive and concerned for students.
                
                   Ridiculously difficult. Questions seemed totally unrelated to subject matter
                
                   Great instructor and awesome lectures. Exams were not hard if you listened to the lectures and studied the powepoint slides. Work load was average.
                
                   Great Guy.
                
                   Dr. Edelman is a nice professor. He has great experience. He is helpful. He understands from his student before they talk. Do not miss to have class with him if you get the chance.
                
                   One of the best Accounting Professors, I've had ever!!
                
                   Dr. Edelman is AWESOME!  He is more than willing to help anytime if you come to him with questions.  He's very professional, very easy to understand, and very easy to talk to.  One of the things I appreciate most about him is his willingness to work with students to help them accomplish their goals.
                
                   Class was boring but professor was knowledgeable in subject area.
                
                   Phenomenol
                
                   I took this class online. Dr. Edwards GA pretty much helped if we had questions. I didn't here from Dr. Edwards after the first 3 weeks of class. We taught ourself and got no help on questions. We took quizes, and didn't see how to work what we missed, so couldn't really learn from it. The GA was great. Not sure what happened to Dr. Edwards.
                
                   As a student, if your approach him from the point of view that he is, &quot;old school,&quot; he is very helpful.  This means being respectful to him.
                
                   As the head of a department, he is very cold and unconcerned. As he sits in his chair, propped up crooked with his right shoulder bearing the weight against the back of the chair, he struggles to even act like he cares, which is highly noticeable.
                
                   Seems ticked off.  May be a conservative in politics so don't be critical about the Republicans (may have been my downfall).  Had an A going into the final, wound up with a B.  Thanks Mr. Wendell.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   he is not a very good teacher and he does not make it clear on what he wants out the class.  Had to take the class two times and then still failed and had to get a new teacher.
                
                   He is an jerk to me. I walked down the halway and he glares at me and makes fun of me. I needed the class to graduate, and he wouldn't let me take it. I had to beg to be let in cause he is not a nice guy
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This is the only guy to take accounting with at A&M-C. Aside from this guy all the other accouting teachers here are terrible. They need more variety in their staff selection. Nobody wants to take the terrible teachers they have now and risk failing Ive had Fullwood, Olibe and i took Mr George last semester, hes the best, hands down.
                
                   Super cool guy. Great Teacher. Knows what he is talking about. Homework in online and easy. Quizzes are tough and random, so you must read but test questions come from quizzes to study for Also drops the lowest four quiz grades. No Major pains or projects, just an overall good guy and good teacher.
                
                   Dr. Gates is very fair and direct.  Her lectures tended to take up the full class time.  Tests are timed at 2-1/2 hours - if you are not prepared, you will NOT finish the tests.  Several small written projects were graded quite easily, making up for my one bad test. Don't miss class - she pretty much tells you what is important.  Great presesence.
                
                   She was easy to communicate with online course.  She is a tough grader.  She is one of those you better have your assignments turned in on time!  She didnt have a powerpoint presentation or anything basically we had to self teach ourselves.  I passed the course.  She knows her stuff, but I would not take her.  
                
                   Test was  consistent with coursework.  If you do your weekly assignments you should be fine.
                
                   I took the online course with Prof. Gates and found her to be hit and miss when it came to responsiveness. Sometimes I'd get an e-mail reply within 24 hours and toward the end of the semester it was more like a week.  I felt the material covered in lecture wasn't necessarily what was on the test we took through the Connect website. Papers were easy
                
                   Agree with everyone's comments.  She is a good instructor if you are attending a class in person but for an On-line class it is tough as you have to learn everything on your own.
                
                   Although the professor is very qualified to teach this course I would not recommend her. Email responses were slow, the quizzes and exams were very long and difficult. The questions on the exam were tricky and not discussed in the class. This class requires a lot of time and study and would not recommend taking it with other courses.
                
                   The biggest issue I had was her inconsistency of the timeliness of her replies to questions. It would have been more helpful if she replied to posts in her virtual office daily, like my last professor did, rather than when it was convenient for her. It was definitely not an easy class. But if you put in the time you'll do fine.
                
                   She knows what she is talking about, everytime I asked her question, she thinks about her grad courses she teaches, not the undergrad course.  She is tough on grading, Test are easy, but other stuff she does grade hard.  I did pass the course, just have to be on your A game thats all if you want an A
                
                   If you intend to take this class online with Prof. Gates, i highly recommend not. The tests/ quizzes are not that hard. The issue you have to deal with her is her unresponsiveness. Email is the only means of communication with her; however, it can takes her days or weeks to respond your emails or even ignore your emails.
                
                   Professor Gates is very knowledgeable on the subject-matter and seems to have a genuine interest in teaching.  However, she may take days to respond to your email inquiries.  She does not seem interested in student questions or concerns.  I would not recommend her, at least in an online learning environment.
                
                   She will not help you at all you will have to figure things out for yourself. She will not check her emails for weeks. She is not far at all good luck if you have to take ACCT 502 because she is the only person teaching this course. do like options but not her. Beware of stuff on the test that you did not go over and she will not go over the exam.
                
                   She was extremely unhelpful and took weeks to grade anything and when you asked her when something would be graded, she would get upset. Also took multiple days to reply to emails or wouldn't reply at all. Course wasn't extremely hard but she gave no help. And gives no extra credit or curve even if the whole class is doing poorly. Don't take her.
                
                   Most boring teacher that ever challenged me and broke my confidence down. Grading system is not fair. Making an A overall with her was nearly impossible. I gave it all and did not happen.
                
                   Lectures were long but she explained the material well. Only tests and no homework but not much different than my other class. If you study, listen to her lectures, and do the practice problems she assigns, the tests are fairly easy.
                
                   A bore of a teacher. I wouldnt classify her as a professor or a DOCTOR as she mandates you call her.  I did well in her class but it had more to due with me studying than her helping students. I suggest you use this teacher as a back up, if all the other great professors are taken up.
                
                   This is a great class with a lot of information! Dr. Heslop helps you along as much, but you need to work for it! Taking a high intense class in a  condensed summer course is not the wisest choice. Good Teacher,
                
                   he's fine everything else except 2 points: 1. when lecturing, sometimes dragged you into unrelated topic for too long. 2. hopefully cover more material in class. 3. one exam is too long w/ limited time.    anyhow, this course doesn't feel like a graduate course. have learned those in undergrad accounting. 
                
                   Thank goodness he curves. This is difficult unless you are an accountant. Tests are difficult. Work problems on your own over and over again. You will not make a B by just reading the text and listening to the lecture. About half of class gets A's, other half gets B's, a couple of individuals gets C's. Nothing lower than that. 
                
                   Excellent class and Prof if you  want to learn - an advanced class to prepare adult students for real world scenarios.  Prof does not spoon feed information just to get you through but holds a 2 hour class each week to review everything - test questions are answered by applying what has been learned in the chapters to real world scenarios.  
                
                   The problem is the quizzes and tests are not similar to the material in ConnectPlus or the book.  The wording/question set up is completely different from what you review.  You can come prepared, but the questions don't even represent real-world accounting situations.  You're given financial info, and you merely need to enter it - not in this class
                
                   I took Dr. Heslop's class in Summer I and it was challenging, but doable. If you are not willing to put the time in to study, don't take him during the summer.   You are not required to do homework, but I recommend you do the practice problems in the Connect system if you want to pass the quizzes and tests.  Bottom line, if I made an A, so can you!
                
                   Not an MBA class. The class is not practical. No rubric, so the grading is subjective for the final paper. Extremely long tests because he evaluate the same concept again and again and then again. Time does not match with the number of questions without mention the downturn for Internet connection is not considered. Class needs a revisit by advisor
                
                   Great Professor 
                
                   Makes things hard than they are. Do not recommend this Professor. 
                
                   You absolutely need to make use of the review materials in WileyPlus. As long as you're at least somewhat familiar with the chapter before you come to class, his lectures make a lot more sense, and you'll get a lot out of them. Tests are fairly hard.
                
                   This teacher is no good if you are not an accounting major or have a good grasp on accounting methods. His lectures are long (over 2 hours) and a lot of the lecture is him rambling on. He complains about students not following instructions and poor grades. There are 4 exams, 3 quizzes & a paper. Do not expect to learn much from him-learn on ur own.
                
                   I had taken my first accounting class with Dr. Gordon. As long as you follow the lectures, and optional assigned homework you will do good in the class.
                
                   He would give reminders when assignements and test are due!  I know I pissed him a couple of times, but I somehow passed his class.  Just read and listen to his lectures and you be good!
                
                   DR. Heslop knows his stuff. His lectures are interspersed with current events to break up the problem solving  and to show how the lectures are congruent with  the real world.  He shows shortcuts and techniques  on the chalkboard to work the problems.  Work the shortcuts and techniques that give you problems at least 15 to 20 times to make a A
                
                   He never stayed on topic. Tests weren't difficult, if you read the chapters, but don't expect a review of any kind, or any ideas of what you will be tested on. There were hardly any assignments until the last 3 weeks of class, when we had 4 or 5 due every week. 
                
                   The worst accounting professor I've had. His online lectures were impossible to follow since he insisted on trying to write words on the screen using his mouse (or something equally useless). The problems he wrote out were unreadable.  He would complain about students during every lecture and was very condescending. I do not recommend Prof. Heslop.
                
                   Dr. Heslop's class is tough! All of his classes are purely lecture. He doesn't give a reviews for his exams so you pretty much don't know what to expect on the exam. He goes very fast through the material. Even though his class was hard he was my favorite teacher. 
                
                   Exams are extremely tough. Don't let me scare you but if you are really good in accounting then you will do fine. Lectures are long and sometimes they are irrelevant to the subject. If you do the HW assignments you would still struggle with the exams. Exams are super long and you will need every single second to complete it. Good Luck!
                
                   Worst Teacher I ever had in my life. Do not take his classes, run away from him. His lectures don't even make sense. Long lectures every week and too many Long exams. Exams don't even go with lectures or homework. His class is based from the online McGraw-Hill Econnect and it is the worst experience I ever had. Do not take this professor. 
                
                   Good online teacher. Very helpful and cares about students.
                
                   Very good!
                
                   Best professor in the Acct dept. I like her teaching and I got a lot of knowledge for Acct government for non profit. She helps the students a lot until we understand. The students have to do a lot of works for homework but it is helpful for the students.
                
                   Good teacher, but as with any online class, its up to you to let the prof know when you need help.  A couple of extra credit assignments were available, and the exams and quizzes are difficult so you must do the homework.
                
                   
                
                   Kapp dismissed complaints about terrible lecture audio quality until mid-term student evaluations. I studied a lot! Homework & quizzes may or may not prep you for exams. I can't believe this prof. holds a Doctorate in Education. Frankly, I've taken much better classes with profs many years her junior. Be ready for a painful &quot;learning&quot; experience.
                
                   If you like to have the powerpoint presentation that comes with the book read to you in class, you're in luck. Read every single page in the book a couple of times or you will have trouble on the exam.
                
                   Very difficult and required that you knew everything in the text.  Make sure you complete and understand the homework assignments.  Even then you will find questions on the tests/quizes that were not covered in the practice homework.  The research paper is not too difficult as long as you follow APA guidelines.
                
                   More of a &quot;faciliator&quot;, by her own admission, than a teacher; at least for online classes. Grading was 12 quizes, 3 tests; all mult choice. All follow the book verbatim and format matches book's problems and charts. Also had research paper, strict API format. Apply yourself always, don't even *think* of playing &quot;catch up&quot;, and you'll do fine.
                
                   Professor Kapp does not teach in this course other than the vague class notes at the beginning of each chapter.  Homework is very challenging and is worth 40% of your grade.  If you have lots of time to spend on a class I would recommend it since she drops the two lowest grades.  Exams are exactly like the quizzes.  Do the work and you will be fine
                
                   I took an online MBA course (ACCT525) with Professor Kapp and found her to be professional, fair, and helpful. The work is definitely challenging but if you work hard, you will have a very positive experience.  I highly recommend her.  In my opinion, one of the best at TAMU-Commerce.
                
                   Terrible prof. Has no clue how to teach. Syllabus was unclear and she kept changing policy and expectations, then would not work with me when assignment was late because of her lack of clarity. Cost me a letter grade. AVOID IF POSSIBLE!
                
                   If you like a prof that actually teaches, & does not change classroom policies midway through the semester, avoid Prof. Kapp.  I took this class online. Prof Kapp does not teach, & assigns weekly homework & 20 question quizzes for a graduate level class.  A lot of the work was redundant and seemed like ?busy work?, not like a graduate course.
                
                   Awesome professor. Have huge reading assignments and cases study. Have representation every class but it is really good for your career as accountant and become a CPA. Knowing a lot of fraud cases, gaining knowledge, experiences and presentation skills. He is a good professor that you never miss his class.
                
                   Expectations are clear, tests follow material
                
                   Actually, a good guy that is understand and will answer questions. Exams are relatively straight forward if you study or listen to lectures. Be sure to keep up with weekly discussions, as they will help boost your grade in the end and provide a cushion in case you need it. I would definitely take him again and recommend him for this course. 
                
                   Had this prof for Ethics in Dallas Campus. Very knowledgeable. Provided good insight from a significant career outside of academia. Helpful. Can't say his tests are easy but if you study the course material you will be fine. If you have the opportunity to take this prof. take him. The class wasn't easy but I learned a lot.
                
                   I wanted to love this class, I really did. The class consists of 1 10-20 page paper, weekly discussions, and 3 exams. The exams are multiple choice but really hard, even if you've read the text. Professor isn't really involved in the class and for me this is a difficult subject without interaction. I'd recommend a different professor.
                
                   Professor seemed to check out towards the end of the semester. There were only three grades, which put the pressure on to do well on the midterm, paper, and final. He never answered any of my questions via email or the question board. Smart, funny, great lecturer, but he was completely absent this semester.
                
                   I've heard wonderful things about this professor and was very excited to take his class. He must have had a very busy semester because the last half of the semester he was nowhere to be found. Didn't answer emails or questions on the class website. Left many students, including myself, angry, confused, and stressed. And quizzes were very tricky. 
                
                   Meadors is a great professor. He wants everyone to understand the material and is very approachable. His lectures are awesome. Very nice guy.
                
                   He is very good professor. He will work to make you understand the course work.
                
                   He is an awesome teacher. He just need to make an effort to check his school email.
                
                   Professor Meadors is an EXCELLENT teacher. His lectures are outstanding and give examples that you can understand and relate to the material. Don't be afraid of the creative paper. It was a great assignment. TAKE HIM if you get the chance.
                
                   Excellent professor. The information is lengthy and dense but he gives you what you need to know in his lectures. Very helpful and responds to students in a timely manner. Would definitely recommend. Be prepared to work however, it's not just given to you.  But in the effort and you will do well.
                
                   Excellent professor.  The information is very lengthy and dense but he gives you what you need to know in his lectures.  Very helpful and responds to students in a timely manner.  Would definitely recommend.  Be prepared to work however.  It's not just given to you, you have to put in the effort.
                
                   Great class.  Lots of lectures and work but not too difficult.  Definitely listen to the lectures!  Overall a good teacher and class.
                
                   He is a laid back prof. Easy going and doesn't really stress students nor makes himself stressed. Reschedules class live sessions a lot. Replies emails only when and if he feels like. Non consistent overall.
                
                   Advanced level Accounting class very well taught. Professor had worked in the field great insights.  Grading is not consistent.
                
                   I took this class on a summer II term. It was very fast pace. However, the instructor made it as painless as possible. I would recommend taking this class from this professor.
                
                   the best one
                
                   Christopher is a nice man . he is very helpful .
                
                   King, caring and responsive. You get multiple tries on HW; there is no reason you can't make a 100 on that portion. Study HW for exams, and old exams for the final!
                
                   I can't believe some people here think this guy is a good teacher.  Maybe these posts are Olibe in disguise.
                
                   I enjoyed taking his class. If you take notes and do your homework, you will do great in the class
                
                   Dr. Olibe is a very intelligent man with high expectations for his students.  No, he will not hand you the grade or the answers.  His tests cover the material he covers in class.  He does tend to be moody at times, but that is only because he has high expectations for his students.  Sweet man who is extremely helpful! Take good notes!
                
                   The class was very challenging but fair. I believe the professor could have incorporated everything together a little better though for the the test. Attendence is recommended.
                
                   He his a good guy that always willing to help his students
                
                   Not an easy class, you must study the chapters before the tests or you will fail, take good notes, go to his office with legitimate questions or to talk about bud light and jack daniels.
                
                   bad...
                
                   Dr. Olibe is very helpful as long as you put forth effort.  Make sure to take good notes.
                
                   Dr. Olibe knows a lot about accounting.  I like the way he teaches, I've learned a lot from listening to his lectures and doing his assigned homework.  Although he is moody sometimes, I believe it is just because the culture difference.  Take some time visiting with him after the class, you will fin
                
                   He expects alot out of you. If you don't work hard and show him respect, he will show you no respect. Take his class serious and avoid arguments with him and you will do fine.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's the worstest teacher I've ever seen. The concept he taught is just confuse you. He will shout at you when you really go to his office and ask him question.
                
                   illtempered, illmannored, and doesn't care if his students learn anything or pass the class
                
                   quick tempered and sometimes has a hateful side. If you can take this course somewhere else, I recommend it, because I believe he's the only one teaching it. As for the entire accounting department at A&M-Commerce, I think it needs some major improvements
                
                   this guy can't even speek english.  he is very short and can barly reach the board...what he does manage to &quot;write&quot; on the board looks like chicken scratch.  i would advise you to NEVER take olibe's courses.  you will be wasting your money!!!
                
                   Always was around to help, yes he did lose his temper but only because he expects for his class to do well. A very sweet man.
                
                   losses his temper really fast and quick
                
                   My favorite professor here at TAMUC. He explains the basic accounting principles with ease and is very understandable. He relates the class material to real world examples. If you have the option, you should take him. If you just come to class and actively listen and pay attention you will get an A with hard work.
                
                   The only negative thing I would have to say is that he WILL learn your NAME and he will call on you all the time lol. There is homework and quizzes over every chapter and 3 tests. Quizzes are online and the multiple choice part of the test is online, the other part is in class. I'm horrible at acct and I got a B, so anyone can pass this class. 
                
                   Amazing professor. He explained really good and made sure you understood.  His quizzes were online and his exam was divided into 2 portion, an online portion and a written portion. The online portion was pretty much like the quizzes. The written portion was the same as the review he uploads. So make sure you do the reviews, that is how I got an A!
                
                   He's an awesome accounting professor. I took him for Acct 221 and 222. I wish he taught all my accounting classes because he explains the material really well and understands this is a learning process. He is very generous with extra credit and tells you exacting what to study for on the exams (practice problems). Hard subject, great teacher. 
                
                   Mr. Rankin's lectures were interesting, he always worked a lot or problems, he would answer specific questions we had about homework, and he would tell you exactly what kind of problems he would put on his exams. Attendance isn't mandatory, but if you don't show up you will struggle on exams. He's also a stickler for time so don't be late to class.
                
                   Rankin's online class was really straight forward. All our homework and quizzes was on WileyPlus. We had homework and quizzes to do each week. Only 3 exams total. Do your homework and you will do good on the exams. 
                
                   He is one of the great accounting professor.  He gets to the point to his lectures! He is one of the best professor I have had at Commerce.  Just be real with him and work hard, and you will be okay!  I was going thru tough times, but glad he was understanding.  He uses real world situation into accounting lectures!  Take him!! 
                
                   I took him a couple of years ago. I was going thru some tough times, and he help me out and he kept on pushing me thru it.  We were his first class to teach at TAMU-Commerce, but I have so much respect for this professor.  He uses real life world to incorporate into lecture.  If he taught another class, I would take him in a heart beat! Take him!!!
                
                   great professor! really wants you to learn material. decent amount of work, bearable. quizzes are on Wiley plus & part of exams are as well. about 5 problems on in class part of exams. applies all examples to real life situations, which made it easier to comprehend. I highly recommend him, but be on time to class!
                
                   Homework and tests were done through Connect so you have to get the book and the connect card. Homework assigned weekly, and you had three tests and one project. Towards the end of the semester you can work on and turn in as much homework early as you would like which helps to free you up for other classes. Homework was tougher than the exams.
                
                   Be prepared to learn CPA review questions. What he teaches has got nothing to do with what shows up on exam.
                
                   His grading system is very fair. Do not overlook homework or assignments that are 1% of the grade. They make a difference. Be diligent, disciplined, and patient in his class in order to succeed.
                
                   best teacher ever.  wish more taught like her.
                
                   Exams were pretty easy. Alot of homework for this class, but as long as you do it, you will pass.
                
                   He gave us all of our assignments and due dates at the beginning of the semester. He doesn't respond quickly to emails. Grades fairly and writes comments on why you received the grade.
                
                   This was an online course and all of the material, lessons, homework, etc was done thru Pearson Lab. The work and expectations were clear cut. Interaction with the teacher was minimal. There was plenty of time to read the material, complete assignments, and quizzes. Mrs. T was very kind in allowing extra time during finals.
                
                   Professor Taggert was very fair, gave good feedback, and responded to emails in a timely fashion. I didn't care for the "feel good socialistic material". There were three lengthy articles we had to read and needed to post 18 comments per artice and write a 2 page summary per article. 
                
                   Prof Taggert was more of a course monitor rather than an instuctor since the instruction, assignments, and grading was 100% via Pearson Learning which was just fine for me. There was just the course code to buy and there were no papers or class discussions in this course. 
                
                   Too bad this is the only instructor for this class at this time. She does not provide a timely response to feedback & with two days left in the semester still has assignments ungraded from the end of Oct & Nov. I've heard students making excuses, but I have never heard of an instructor making excuses. Hopefully the college will get an alternative.
                
                   Knowledge management was a somewhat interesting class. The book was outdated,2000, and she was HORRIBLE about grading on time. Two months went by before assignments were graded. But the class was appropriate, she grades fair, no group projects. I would definately recommend.
                
                   TERRIBLE INSTRUCTOR. She doesn't grade, doesn't know the material, and doesn't respond to your emails in a reasonable amount of time. Our midterm covered material that was on homework assignments that she hadn't graded. So we had no way to know if we were doing the work correctly. The midterm itself was very unorganized inconsistent. Avoid Taggart.
                
                   Accounting II is easier than Accounting I.However, it's still accounting,you really have to apply the concepts and formulas in this course.Basically, you have to do the work.Professor Taggart is an awesome professor, she is patience and more than willing to help you if you need help. You never have to be ashamed in this course. STUDY!
                
                   Very good instructor.  You will do fine in the class as long as you read the chapters and do the homework.
                
                   Very Helpful! She is deffinetly on my top three favorite professors that I have ever had! Highly recommend taking her for Accounting!
                
                   Took her online class and for someone that has never taken an accounting class l found it extremely hard. Her homework assignments take up to 3 hours plus. In order to pass this class you have to thoroughly pour yourself into the book and use the online help me work this because the questions she asks are not broken down in the textbook.
                
                   Knows accounting, makes it interesting for non-majors. You have to do the work to do well, but she is very fair.
                
                   Knows accounting; good at explaining; makes class interesting.
                
                   Mr. Tucker is an awesome professor! I took this class online and Mr. Tucker was always willing to answer questions and made sure I understood the answers! He cares about the success of his students. He is one of the best professors I've had! I highly recommend him!
                
                   I had this class online last spring. What a joke. Mr. Tucker did not even check in with the class during the semester. You just do the multiple choice quizzes and the tests, and that's it. No learning here. Waste of money and time.
                
                   Super helpful! If you just ask for help he'll tell you how to do everything down to the answer. Honestly think he cared more about you learning than worried about the grading. He's one of the best professors I've ever had.
                
                   First impression nice one. Summer II on-line class had unrealistic 5 detailed quizzes 1 point/40Q, 2 hours limit. Mighty long homework 4 hours+blank Q - one page long. Final comprehensive 60 Q 5 hours limit - no curve, no study guides only for final, no special credit. You decide what suits you!
                
                   Professor Wilson loves the Forensic Investigative stuff! he knows his stuff, an d gladly shares it with you as a class. However don't be fooled, you must read as well as listen to the lectures  to pass this class! Tests are tough - but he is a great teacher.
                
                   I am having a lot of difficulty in this class, which is sad. I intended yo take a more in depth forensics class, but I am now very strongly reconsidering. I listen to lectures, read the chapters, and complete all homework assignments. However, I find that the test questions are often unclear and do not align with the material provided.
                
                   He is the best Professor ,I strongly recommend him .
                
                   I took Dr. wilson for other classes and he had much more practical knowledge. He didn't seem to have much to add except basic audit. The book was unclear. Dr. Wilson followed the book, but did not make it any clearer. Problems didn't match the test materials. I thought this would be an interesting class. It wasn't.
                
                   I thought I was going to fail this course, but I got a B.  Just be ready to do the homework, and if you do the homework and understand.  You will do well on test! I took him online and he was easy to communicate with.  Homework is alot though, just be ready to read and do homework.  If you do not do both, then you will fail his class!
                
                   This was the first class I ever dropped in grad school. The tests are not aligned with the lectures or the book. He knows his stuff but goes WAY over our heads into tangents about hypothetical situation not applicable to the exam. He grades fair, but don't take this class over the summer. You'll fail or drop. It's all based on Cengage except tests.
                
                   Professor is not straightforward.  Avoids answering questions directly.  Not a good teacher.  His tests are nothing like the homework (yet he tells you to study the homework, but it does not help), and the difficulty is escalated significantly on the exams.  The book was not helpful either.  During the live sessions, he just talks to hear himself talk and doesn't listen to his students.  And, I really believe that he doesn't know how to teach.  Worst professor I've ever had.   
                
                   Dr. Wilson is a great instructor. Very prompt with emails and very detailed in the chat sessions. The only bad thing about the class is the Cengage homework, not that it is really that difficult but it takes sometime 20 to 30 hours a week to get it all finished. Highly recommend Dr. Wilson, he knows his stuff but be ready to put some time in.
                
                   Weekly homework and 4 exams.
                
                   It was very interesting class I have ever taken.  His test is free lance answer online.  His homework is so much worse than a math class, but it prepares you for the exam.  He will work with you and he did with me.  I called him at home before and he helped me out.  I thought I was going to get a D or C, but I ended up with a B. No complains on him
                
                   Extreme amount of homework, tests, assignments, papers, group projects, powerpoint, etc. Do not take this professor. He stalls to answer questions and is not clear with responses.
                
                   RUN RUN RUN!  Prof. was attentive but he demands WAY too much!  5 quizes (3hrs each), 3 exams (3hrs each), ppt presentation (live online), research paper, group finance paper (approx. 30 pgs).  The quizes and tests are different from your SELF TAUGHT homework and what's in the book! He is way over the top! Curves at the end but by then you're dead!
                
                   Class involved a lot of homework.  Tests didn't really follow the homework problems.  They followed them in a roundabout way where you had to weed through the misinformation.  Prof was a nice guy.  There were weekly live class sessions and he was quite responsive to e-mail.  Overall, a time intensive class and not too straightforward.
                
                   He was very helpful, when you called him to ask, he helped me alot, I thought I was going to get a C, but he gave me a B.  Just do the homework, because it will prepare for you for the test.  Homework is alot, but if you do it, you will ace his tests.
                
                   Mandatory class for online MBA. Very nice, fair & easy-going prof, but class is VERY labor-intensive. LOTS of homework (10-15 hrs/wk), which must be in on time each wk or he will not grade your tests. But tests are pretty easy, if you do the homework. Only 1 written assignment which was easy too. He's hard to reach though, and responses take days.
                
                   Really good teacher, but can take days to respond to emails.  Best way to reach him is by phone.  Test are straight forward from material in the book.
                
                   Of the instructors who teach ACCT 525 for the MBA online, Tim Wilson is the least of the three evils.  I have yet to figure out how to make answers that are good enough for a B or an A on his tests and written projects, even though my answers are correct - he wants you to give detailed explanation, and mine are never good enough for some reason.
                
                   WORST
                
                   .
                
                   Laid back prof- easy to reach over email or phone. willing to help out with class materials. If you do the homework you will pass the exams! One written assignment for the class.
                
                   VERY ENTHUSIATIC, BUT WANTS EVERYONE TAKING HIS COURSE TO BECOME A CPA, OR GET YOUR DEGREE IN ACCOUNTING
                
                   The best prof. I've ever had, I would recommend him to anyone, he takes time out of class to clarify if you don't understand, and he won't teach a huge amount in one class. He goes slow so you shouldn't get lost. Tests are easy. Don't get on his bad side by forgetting your book.
                
                   He presents the material well however he is of no help if you dont understand something and berates students in class. If your not an accounting major your an idiot according to him. Alot of busy work and if you go to him for help with the practice set, he just gives you the answer and kicks you out, or tell you to figure it out, THEN kicks you out.
                
                   This is a great professor. He explains the material as well as any professor I have ever had. However, you must actually put work in to learn the material. &quot;Accounting is not a spectator sports&quot; so if you wanted everything to be handed to you on
                
                   Great teacher.  Eplains everything very clearly, however you need to read the book to understand.
                
                   He explains the material very well (better than other accounting professors).  However, he is unapproachable.
                
                   HE GOES TOO FAST!
                
                   The class gets too fast and demanding. Way too much work, especially for those who aren't even majoring in Accounting or business. Gets irritated if you ask him for help in class.
                
                   While shes a very nice lady, she doesnt realize how hard it is to comprehend the material she presents.  When explaining an account problem, she shows the powerpoint with the work already completed so you dont know what numbers are given and what numbers you have to figure out. tests are easy, she hands out papers with the info u need to know
                
                   I took it online for Governmental Accounting.  Let's you all of the semesters work at your own pace.  Very understanding in grading and occassionally gives curves on tests.  Will pass as long as you do work he gives.
                
                   An excllent profeossor who teaches from experience.  Online quizes and excellent memos determine your grade.  Easy A if you do your work and care about it.
                
                   Nice old lady, but goes over huge sums and rushes through examples. She doesn't explain very well, I learned mostly everything on my own. She goes strictly by the book and always teaches with the answer sheet in her hand. She also takes attendance every class. I wouldn't recommend her.
                
                   Great professor all around. Tests are difficult, but lets you have one cheat sheet. Be prepared for in-class quizzes on every chapter. Goes out of his way to help you if you ask for it. Clear grading, but don't miss class; it was very easy to fall behind and get confused 
                
                   Attendance is part of grade. Web problems online were easy. Never used the textbook. You get to use a cheat sheet on the exams. Curves the quizzes. Uses ppt and excel. Be sure to understand what's going on from the beginning. Pretty good prof
                
                   The material in this class is hard and he's not going to baby you through it. But you get a page of notes for each test and he's easy to approach with questions. If you read the chapters and do the homework before you have take a quiz you should do fine.
                
                   I'm bad at accounting but after being in this class for a week, I wasn't worried. You get a 'cheat sheet' for every test, he curves every grade you get, and has lots of options for points. He uses power point and excel so if that's not your style, avoid him.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Smart guy, funny, and approachable. If youve made it this far your an accounting major, if this is an elective for you GOOD LUCK! Downside is he goes very fast and does all his teaching from EXCEL which is a pain in the ass. However, if your lost he will stop the clas and get you up to speed.
                
                   As long as you read the book, his lectures were easy to follow. His exams matched his homework closely. Great professor! I have learned A LOT!
                
                   Professor was terrible. Many people dropped the class. Highly recommend not taking him at all!!!
                
                   Highly recommend to SKIP Dr. Bo Ouyang when registering for an Accounting class. He has a strong accent and lectures straight from the slides/book. That's it. Any personal insights into concepts&#63; Forget it! Extra written examples of problems&#63; NO WAY. Everything is textbook with this guy, nothing more. Exams are ourageously difficult. F+ for Ouyang.
                
                   She is a tough teacher but her teaching style is to make you think and understand. There is quite a bit missing from her lecture that's on the test so you have to read the chapter summaries and take the practice assessments in Orion to fill in the gaps. She's difficult to approach but her teaching assistants are very helpful and nice.
                
                   She always just READ powerpoint slides.. and solve discussion questions( like multiple questions). She sometimews seemed to be confused about questions. If we do not have enough time, she skips the questions and go thru another chapter.... You will get good grade if you study hard these questions, but....
                
                   This professor confuses herself easily. She spends WAY too much time on each question of the chapter reviews, thus not leaving enough time to go over everything. She goes off on tangents much too easily. She also expects everyone to already know something about accounting before entering the class and doesn't thoroughly explain the subject matter.
                
                   very nice and helpful teacher.
                
                   He is my favorite professor. focus on concept and he did not care if you have mistake on rounding or multiplying number. he is willing to help and very dedicated. strongly recommend. im happy to read for his exam. 
                
                   Tough subject in general, and he is the only teacher teaching it. 
                
                   Excellent professor! Explains the material in his own way that can be related to the real world. Best accounting professor that I have had yet! Has his own way of teaching that helps students remember the material. Is very understanding and helpful if you have any questions. Also, he has a great sense of humor! Highly recommend!
                
                   Zebda is the best accounting teacher I've ever had. He has his own style of teaching that  encourages learning the conceptual ideas, then applying them to real world senarios. Very friendly, loves to teach, and actually cares about students LEARNING something, rather than memorizing from a book. Really wish he taught more classes!
                
                   This is the best Professor I have ever had. Attendence is not mandatory, but he gives you the grade you deserve and attendence is a big part of that. Only reason that I would consider Grad School at TAMUCC is this man. Absolutely loves his job and lives for it. Always on campus, and is extremely friendly.
                
                   Excellent accounting prof; teaches to real world and not to tests or text
                
                   
                
                   hard to understand and you are basically teaching yourself. 
                
                   This professor might be one of the hardest to understand in the college of business here at TAMUCC. I would not suggest anyone but my worst enemy to take this class. 
                
                   Professor Zeidan is a nice, funny guy but that doesn't make him a good professor. He can talk for hours about irrelevant information so be prepared to stay until the bitter end. Tests are nothing like the material he goes over in class. One of the worst accounting professors I've had at TAMUCC. Very disappointing. 
                
                   The professor was very knowledgeable in the subject and I leaned a lot from him.  
                
                   Exercises take some time to complete, if you can multitask you won't have to do much work outside of class. He is really helpful so listen and ask questions! 
                
                   Although the work load is somewhat heavy, Professor Zeidan gives you every opportunity to succeed. Goes over everything really well, and is EXTREMELY helpful if you get stuck on something. He is very knowledgeable. Take the early class, less people and more  time to help with the assignments. One of the best professors I have taken. 
                
                   This is The hardest accounting class that you can take on this campus
                
                   He is very confusing and the tests have nothing to do with the material we learn, not that much was taught during class.
                
                   Dr. Zeidan is a phenomenal professor! Although the subject matter is tricky and sometimes downright screwed up, he does his best to accommodate, guide, and teach his students. He is very knowledgeable, not only of accounting but its life applications. He is also available in his office for extra help nearly ALL THE TIME or will make time!
                
                   Dr. Z is a decent professor, he tries to make things interesting in class. The biggest downside is his lecture style, he doesn't really teach from a concept standpoint. The key to doing well in this course is application and figuring things out on your own. Unfortunately, the real world and accounting is part of what this course tries to teach you.
                
                   This class is advanced and requires some knowledge in the acct field.  The textbook  is not very good.  Dr. Z does his best to help you understand with the time allowed.  He is fast at responding to emails, and is willing to meet beyond his office hours.  He is very understanding.  Word of advice start your projects early and show them to him.
                
                   Honestly just a terrible class. He is very confusing and often starts to ramble about pointless things. Go to SI sessions for PKL, he is completely unhelpful. He's a nice guy and he really tries to make you laugh, but his work ethic is awful. I learned more going to tutoring with a TA. Take someone else.
                
                   Very unstructured and confusing class. Class objectives were unclear from day one. He gives little instruction on what is expected for assignments and contradicts himself often. Lots of class time wasted on pointless stories and examples. I was looking forward to this class, but I feel that I learned nothing that will benefit me in the future.
                
                   Dr. Zeidan is an extremely nice professor who genuinely wants his students to learn.  The lectures are structured in a way where it is almost impossible to pay attention...I took an 8AM so that's probably my fault.  He is really helpful if you ask him...if you read the book and go to class you'll be fine.
                
                   Dr. Zeidan is a brilliant, experienced, funny man, but you're pretty much on your own when it comes to grades and learning due to the class's lack of any structure. I enjoy learning things on my own, so getting myself though online assignments and quizzes was no problem. However, if you need to be guided or coddled, do not take Dr. Zeidan.
                
                   He is an extremely nice and helpful professor.He is willing to answer any questions and meet during office hours.READ the textbook, it is easier to understand than he is (he has an accent). I did not attend class regularly but had 100+ on almost every assignment. You'll do fine if you actually read the book and do some problems.He curves everything
                
                   Very nice instructor and is willing to meet with you in office. Lectures are not organized, and tough to determine what to expect on exams. Much more complicated than it has to be.
                
                   Very sweet man, but has a horrible teaching style.  Very hard to understand and catch on to his class. Must attend class and do all the exercises at the end of the chapter to MAYBE understand what is going on.
                
                   Passionate about Accounting. He is an experienced accountant so his real world insight is invaluable. He lectures while doing exercises off of Blackboard and working them out on excel. He cares very much about his students and does everything he can to work with them and see to it they do well. You've got to do the book exercises to pass.
                
                   Vito is amazin and one of the best professors that I have had at this school. He is incredibly understanding and willing to work with students in all situations. I am terrible at math and I have received A's in all 3 classes with him. I absolutely loved his classes. He was funny and is overall a great professor.
                
                   Best instructor, he relates the difficult material to something you know and uses it as examples. I love his classes!!
                
                   He is sort of difficult to understand and follow but is awesome one-on-one. The material itself is somewhat hard but once youve got its easy to breeze through. Overall hes a decent teacher, I had him for 3 different classes and got 2 A's and a B. No quizzes really just about 3 major tests and are usually one to three problems.
                
                   Classes are fun, easy to stay awake in.  Vito is very knowledgeable, and anything he doesn't know, he just makes up.  Mixed feelings on this proff.
                
                   good
                
                   Vito is part of a rare breed.  A true teacher; one who understands that the student must outsmart the teacher for both to succeed.
                
                   Great professor! Very helpful and personable, willing to help students outside of class! Totally would recommend this prof!
                
                   He is a great teacher.  He takes a not so intresting subject and makes it fun to learn. He also knows the ins and outs of the real world of buisness.
                
                   Great teacher for actual applicable business accounting-he is still in the business, so is able to relate class with day to day problems-He is also great at explaining things in several different ways to help you understand and invites questions from the class-Definitely would recommend his classes
                
                   Great professor overall. Has a very &quot;tell it like it is&quot; approach. Gives advice on how to survive in the business world every chance he gets. Also his cynicism towards life is a great way to keep students attentive.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The only piece of advise I can give is GO TO CLASS. He gives quizzes piratically daily. Tests aren't too tricky or designed to trip you up. They are fair assessments of your knowledge. Take the homework seriously.  Notes are crucial.  Overall, he is a good, understandable professor who wants students who want to learn to do well.
                
                   Bus. Combo.: Easy class, but requires thorough understanding of accounting concepts. Mechanical knowledge is not enough: you must know what you are are doing. Problems can get complex, but if you understand &quot;why&quot; adjustments, elimination and distributions are being made, the class is very easy.
                
                   Detail oriented professor.  If you miss class might as well give yourself an F, you will not catch up.  You will learn the most with him.
                
                   Not a hard class if you go to class and pay attention. Test are over easy stuff a few times. He tells you what to study for the final. You need the textbook! Easy to understand the material.
                
                   Very knowledgeble.
                
                   Some kind of super genius. A person could learn a lot from him.
                
                   Maticoulous professor.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The class is going to be hard if you don't have prior accounting coursework.  There are quizzes every day so don't miss class if at all possible.  It came easier for me than to most people because I took Accounting in high school.
                
                   BORING. I fell asleep in his class twice.. and didn't wake up until 15 minutes after class finished.
                
                   I heard many bad things about him, but he was not that bad. I actually learned and found his class to be interesting. What makes him &quot;hard&quot; is that you actually have to go to class and listen.
                
                   I took B. Law with Dr. Rivera back in 1992/1993 - great, challending courses.  This was 20 years ago, and the man was great back then.  I'm a CPA (public and industry), and am a better professional from attending his courses!  Rock on!
                
                   He is a very good teacher.I heard lots of think about this class and teacher and how hard it is.This class is not that bad go to school and read the book.Project and community service.it lots of work but he will work with you.Listen him and do what he said you will be fine
                
                   READ THE TEXT! Professor quizzes over reading assignments. Also requires that you complete case studies for each chapter. Major project (Corp/LLC Formation, business contract), but it is individual. Requires 10 hrs community service. Read the text, and complete assignments, and GO TO CLASS! Do this and you'll be fine.
                
                   A tax attorney very difficult if u do not attend class.  Your grade is your grade.  Sets law school standards for business classes.  Not a class for slackers
                
                   this class is complicated, but he makes it fun and interesting. oh yeah, he's a big Seinfeld fan.
                
                   Read, do your homework, and go to class and you'll be sure to get an A.
                
                   He's good.  He's the only one that teaches b-law.  He also teaches upper level accounting classes.
                
                   AMAZING CLASS! I wish she taught other classes besides 2301. And if I had the chance I would hit that. TEAR IT UP
                
                   She is a very helpful teacher.one of the best accounting teacher.Take her class you learn.Her class is not hard.attendence,practice and homework is key to success in this class.I recommand this teacher.
                
                   She is a very good teacher.one of the best accounting teacher.Take her class you learn.Her class is not hard.attendence,practice and homework is key to success in this class.I recommand this teacher.
                
                   Instructor cuts through the textbooks jargon and explains what we are doing, and what it's used for. Goes out of her way to explain problem and difficult concepts. Always available during office hours, always helps students when needed. VERY knowledgeable about the profession. Asset to the business school.
                
                   very intelligent professor every test set up for the CPA exam.  Goes out of her way for students.  Homework helps your grade and essentially helps with the test.
                
                   I've sat in this professor's class twice and both times were horrible. He creates he own exams in his own words and is beyond confusing. He has a poor rating for a reason.  I'd rather leave the university than to sit another class of his! 
                
                   He is horrible at working with the students. He tells you that way back when, he went to Law school, raised kids and had his own business(blah blah blah). Basically there are no excuses for him, which is understandable, except he doesn't work with you at all when you need help. It's your problem. Always uses trick questions on test! Tough class!
                
                   As long as you review chapter before each class . Starts making sense. Test over chapters review included. Easy A or B
                
                   Avoid his classes. He was an attorney and talks all high and mighty that's he's better than everyone else because he has all these degrees. All he does is read from the book. He's a horrible teacher, he's not meant to be a teacher. He's also super boring and no enthusiasm what so ever. He's not even helpful. AVOID HIM!!!
                
                   I love Barrera.  He is such a great role model and is always trying to engage the class in things.  Yes the man drones on and on, but he's better than other Accounting professors.  Consider the class to be a break
                
                   BORING!!!drones on and on and on and on and on and on! tests are difficult as well.
                
                   Very inconsistent and doesn't stick with the plan, She is terrible with instruction
                
                   Batch is all over the place - very hard to understand what she wants or means. I got a B in the class, but most of it was self taught. Make sure you do all of the Homework and the main project - this will help with your grades. She is very strict and will not move test dates or offer assistance through the phone.
                
                   You can tell she is really into what she teaches; however, she is very spastic. She gets distracted and winds up covering 3 out of the 8 problems she was supposed to go over. What was on the tests did not match up with homework or lectures. I only got an A because I got outside help and am an acct major. She is a nice lady but not a great teacher.
                
                   test are difficult to master if you just go based off of homework and lectures.  must read the text. homework is pretty straight foward. she gives you two chances to do the quizzes but the second score is saved even if it is lower, which is the drawback. 
                
                   Teacher explained areas well. Also made the material interesting.
                
                   I took this course online in Spring 2014. The online T/F quizzes are super easy. The homework is actually pretty easy as long as you look at the examples in the book. And the tests are easy but be sure to look at the test reviews for each chapter. She takes about 40% of her questions from the reviews.
                
                   True, false online quizzes are easy. She does HW in class then you just have to type it up in excel and submit, easy! Midterm is slightly difficult but open book/online but don't take lightly bc you could fail it as many did if you don't prepare for it. Final is open book and online, prepare and you will be fine. Final & midterm areonlineeasyclass
                
                   She is not very helpful or understanding.  No flexibility.  Very little time to complete online test.  Gives one day to review/prepare for test.  Lecture is straight from PowerPoint.
                
                   Good instructor. Very clear and helpful. Read the book, do the homework. Ask questions when needed. Recommended.
                
                   Lacked a clear plan from day 1. Syllabus was not adhered to, assignments were not returned, overall status of where you stand was never given, very unclear answers when asked questions.  Bottom line - she does not teach.  She asks why you don't know the answer to your own questions?  Will blame you for not reading or comprehending.  Avoid, avoid..
                
                   Has other priorities than class or students.  Refuses to answer direct student questions, answers with a question to another student.  Refuses to verbally summarize and review material or student responses. You will feel like you went through an interrogation by the end of class. Do not expect any direct answers.
                
                   Ms. Davis is an extraordinary professor. She?s by far the best teacher I?ve taken at TAMU-CT. Word of caution, she covers material fast and furious and her exams are no joke.
                
                   I have taken several classes from this prof.  Yes! Her exams are extremely difficult! But her subject matter knowledge is unsurpassed, she truly cares about students, and is available for help.  She makes every effort to make sure that students get what they (or parents) are paying for,valuable education. Take her class if you really want to learn!
                
                   She said that she would be there for help even gave her number, but would never anwser.. This class was hard, she moved to fast through her lectures hard to catch up.
                
                   This class was a real fun class. If you understand the material you may not need to attend class, only for the exams. It does help to have a decent knowledge of excel. The homework is easy, you follow step by step on all the assignments. If you need help she is willing to provide assistance.
                
                   On the first day of class she said that coming to class is not mandatory, but it should be, because if you miss class, you may not know how to complete the assignment, and goo luck getting her to help you.  The tests are hard and tricky.  During class, I thought she moved through the tutorials too quickly.
                
                   Tests will make you want to cry!  Other than that, a great instructor.
                
                   Her class is not easy, but she is extremely helpful. You will have to put in alot of time and effort to make an A in this class, but in the end, you will definately know your stuff!!!
                
                   Knows her stuff.
                
                   This instructor is not easy, but she is not hard either. She will help her students in everyway possible. She truely cares, and she wants you to learn the material!! beleive me, you will have to study alot in order to make an A in this class! But in the end, you will know your stuff!! Oh, and by the way, she is pretty funny too!!
                
                   Terrible teacher and rude person!!!
                
                   Mr. Duncan is a good teacher. His class is difficult but yet again thats accounting for you. Quit whining and just do the homework.
                
                   Ok so its almost the end of the class and I can honestly say that this is most awful experience I have ever been through - I think this guy is from Whoville (grinch)
                
                   I am a eager to learn anything new.  I am especially eager to learn my degree, which is Accounting.  I feel in this class I have not learned much of anything.  The lectures consist of no teaching, no feedback, and forget if you would like to meet with him.  Me and several of my classmates are having to teach each other.
                
                   This instructor must hate his job.   I honestly beleive that he goes out of his way to make this class difficult and attempts to ensure failure of his students.  He is unapproachable and he will not answer questions in or out of class.  I'm NOT failing his class I have an A so I am not just complaining - avoid him if you have a choice!
                
                   Very confusing, not helpful.
                
                   Mr. Duncan is a facilitator not really a teacher per say.  He reads his slides and you are on your own for your homework.  There is no help for you becuase he will give you help but you can't change it before you turn in your work.
                
                   Despite his smart mouth he is a very good teacher and very fair in his grading. If you do the work and pay attention in class you will do good. He isn't very helpful if you have question so you should find a friend to help if needed. I have had no problems in the 2 years I have taken classes with him.
                
                   She's a great professor. I'm taking the part 2 of this class next semester and looking forward to it.  There is a homework assignment every week, and a test for every 3 chapters. 
                
                   This class was extremely hard, if you have a Mac, dont take it. The software she uses isnt specific to Macs so you are on your own or you find a windows computer.
                
                   This class was so extremely difficult online and I know most of our classmates would agree with me, we basically started emailing each other because when we would ask for help we would get links to third party websites (duh were college students we've already been doing that). 
                
                   Class was hard, mainly because govt acct is a whole new topic. she is helpful, but didn't really like her way of teaching. exams were online. read straight out of the textbook. Read and you should pass, overall easy A class, but requires reading.
                
                   I hate this class. I've never had an essay so strict. You have to turn in the articles that you use and a minimum 15 sources. He takes off points for everything including where you sources are from. If your essay is short, automatic 0. There's a test, quiz and discussions every week. I like that there are 5 quiz attempts but I hate everything else.
                
                   Dr. Ritter is a terrible professor and I would never recommend him to another student.  Dr. Ritter seems more impressed with himself than he is interested in helping his students.  Course syllabus  and assignments are extremely confusing.  When you ask questions or for help he gives you a one sentence answer and seems annoyed.  
                
                   Research paper is majority of the grade...if you can write in English and follow APA, you will get an "A." I didn't do well on the quizzes or the exams, still earned an "A."
                
                   This course is a lot of work. Read the book and you will pass the quizzes/exams. Just familiarize yourself with the book, since it is timed. Reasearch paper is very long and takes a lot of time so get the easy work out the way to make time for the research paper. It is 12 pgs of text not to include abstract or resources. Overall good professor.
                
                   This course is a lot of work. As long as you read you will pass all quizzes/exams. Familiarize yourself w/ where in the book to find the material though, it is timed. Reasearch paper is A LOT of work! That is the only thing that makes the course workload heavy. Take quizzes/exams early so you can focus on the paper. It is a 12 pg full texas paper.
                
                   Dr. Ritter was always very helpful. I took three classes with him,and so far he is the best professor in tamuct(16 courses taken). Yes, the classes are hard, but he makes you learn and teaches you to work on your own, which is important in real world. If you want a free pass, dont take him.
                
                   I can't relate to the comments below, bc Dr. Ritter was very helpful in our class. I took Estate Planning, and we did A LOT of research but that was expected with an online course. He provided feedback with assignments and all in a timely manner. Honestly, he is one of my fav. prof. -aside from Dr. Vitucci, McNett, & Kelly, they are all GREAT!!!!
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS MAN!!!!! Thisthe hardest class I have ever taken. it is accounting spreadsheets and the amount of work is UNREAL. They assignments and exams are graduate level and take over 8 hours to complete. He grades very strict and he messed up my assignment grade. After emailing 3 times r corrections..grade changed from a D to B. Really?
                
                   I have him for Tax Acct this semester, it is quite frustrating how he grades the discussions, I met all requirements, but still got a 70? and he never responded to my emails, thats annoying. Other than that, its an internet course, with little teaching, and no communication. Wouldn't recommend, honestly.
                
                   Discussions are required.  He doesn't give you any grading criteria but usually will give you a 70 on discussions.  He is not available to students.  I'm surprised this new school would want to keep this guy around.  It's almost like he wants his students to fail or be unsuccesful.  You have quizzes and 4 tests, chapter are about 40 pages long.
                
                   Has a very confusing syllabus that he changes through the course (not for your benefit).  He does not respond to email/messages and is slow at grading.  There are times when several assignments are pending so you don't know how to improve on the next.  He does not give clear feedback, sometimes none at all.
                
                   This was the absolute worst class I have ever taken.  Instructions are not clear.  I have A's in all my accounting classes but I am thankful I passed this one.
                
                   Do not expect Dr. Ritter to be helpful or to actually teach you anything. You are pretty much on your own. No preparation for the kinds of questions you will see on the exam. It is not uncommon for the entire class to fail an exam and for him to round everyone up to at least a passing grade. Your research and quizzes will be what saves you.
                
                   I had Dr. Lelkes for the online course. Workload is as expected for a graduate course. She is very helpful and answers email quickly and does specify for us to be considerate and read syllabus/announcements before asking questions just in case our questions are already answered so as to allow her to focus on our more important questions.
                
                   I took professor Lelkes in an online accounting class two semesters ago. She offers little to no help. Any email directly to her will be met with rude and short answers followed up with read the syllabus. The workload in the class is monumental. I do not recommend taking it with her. 
                
                   Dr. Lelkes does everything in her class in a precise manner that helps so much when you need organization in a course. There's only two tests, however, and each counts 25%. Study hard, and do all the hand outs and homework, and your A will be achieved.
                
                   I took her class two years ago and I am going to take her MBA class again. She is really helpful and she knows what ACCT is, she write everything in detail and willing to help you step by step. Also, she will give you a reasonable grade and most of time if you go to class you will get A for sure. Make sure to get her class.
                
                   Perfect teacher!!!  She made class enjoyable.  At times it seems like the class is going fast but she has a way of getting you to understand the material.  This was my favorite class this semester.  The homework she assigns really helps you.  Make sure you sit next to people that you want to study with :)  GREAT PROFESSOR!  Final exam is optional.
                
                   She requires book in class. She gives group quizzes at the end of class and you cannot go out unless you score 100%. Her exams come straight from her lecture and example in class. As long as you come to class and learn, you are guaranteed an A. This class is very helpful if you plan to take Cost Account ACCT 3314!!!
                
                   She was absolutely the worst accounting teacher I've ever had. She was not helpful at all; any questions my classmates and I had were met with contempt and ridicule. She hated us asking questions, and never gave a straight answer. Anybody not kissing up to her on a regular basis did not do well in the class. Beware this professor at all costs.
                
                   Wonderful professor! I absolutely loved every minute of her classes. She is passionate about teaching and will go above and beyond to help her students. The students who don't like her are not willing to put in the work. Dr. Leathart inspired me to go to grad school. I had her for 4 different classes and would take her again if I could.
                
                   Dr. Leathart is an amazing professors. She is interested in her students and loves what she teaches. She is passionate and will go above and beyond to help you. I have had her every semester for two years and she is the reason I am going to grad school. The students that don't like her are the ones who won't do the work. She is a wonderful person!
                
                   Horrible, horrible, awful!  The worst teacher I've ever experienced.  She has no idea what she's doing and honestly has no grasp of the material that she's supposed to be teaching.  She doesn't care about her students and even made some wait 3 months to even receive a grade.  I could write a novel about the unfathomable degree of her ineptitude.
                
                   you can not ask questions, she is very temperamental.  You must self teach yourself completely.  I enjoy accounting but not her class.  She is so knowledgeable, just doesn't teach well. Our class needed a more structured lecture.
                
                   This professor was not helpful. Many times when students would ask questions, she would yell and scream. HORRIBLE INSTRUCTOR! If are not good at self-teaching stay away from this instructor. The book was useless also because it did not provide enough examples. Even ordered the study guide for the book and it did not provide any additional examples.
                
                   You have to teach yourself the work she acts confused and gets very upset weyu ask a question.
                
                   If you show up for class and put forth a minimal amount of effort into doing assignments you can get an A in this class. Lots of multiple attempt quizzes/exams
                
                   Great professor, took him for many classes and would take again. Helpful and cares about his students! Never hesitate to ask questions he's there for you! would recommend.
                
                   Took this class in 8 weeks, requires studying. Dr. Calk is a very helpful professor, do the homework and quizzes.
                
                   Great Professor, Will be taking him again in the summer and fall! Teaches you everything you need to know for the exam. You must study for this class, put in the effort and you'll be fine! Ask questions! He will help! Class is not tough but not easy, requires studying.
                
                   I took Dr. Calk online he is an awesome and passionate instructor. He takes his time to explain accounting and he will assist you if you ask for help. He provided printable slides and PowerPoint lectures for each section. There was a pretty easy quiz every week and an exam every other week, but there was nothing due during holidays or weekends. 
                
                   Very good instructor! He teaches you all the material you need for the exams, and there are never any surprises. He gives a  "pop" quiz almost every class period but they only cover what you learned in the previous period and give you a great chance for extra credit. There are 4 exams and 1 comprehensive final. I would definitely take again!
                
                   Definitely the intelligent professor by far. She prepares you for the real world and has high expectations. I am very grateful to have had her as a professor. I was prepared and knowledgable for my future in accounting. I wish all professors cared so much about the future of their students. You have to work hard, but what do you expect in college??
                
                   Dr. Lewis' mentality is that by the end of the program, you should be a "master" in your field. Therefore, her classes are not easy but She is extremely helpful. People in her classes fail to realize that these are graduate courses not undergraduate so they don't put in the work and then reap the consequences. Made an A.
                
                   Focus on the quizzes and practice exams. The exams are worth 75% Do all your work but the exams count the most. She is not flexible with the grading.
                
                   Rigid professor,antiquated, unwilling to change lecture style: reads off power points as lecture. Tests & Questions are not what is given on reviews to study. 3 test highly weighted @ 25%each while HW & Quiz only weighted 25% and Paper project only weighted 2 quiz grades.Syllabus says you will make a "B". Very sad
                
                   Not worth your time
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I had Dr Green for 3 classes he is super helpful and brings a great deal of knowledge to the classroom. He might be confusing at times but is willing to give instructions again and clarify. His lectures prepare you for the real world to have a real conversation about accounting. I learned a lot about the new revenue recognition rules.
                
                   Love him!
                
                   love him!One of the best accounting teachers around
                
                   PROFESSOR IS TRULY UNDERSTANDING IN REALTIONS TO DEADLINES FOR CLASSROOM WORK. HE IS ALWAYS WILLING TO HELP OUT WHERE EVER NEEDED. HE SOMETIMES TALKS OFF SUBJECT, BUT IT HELPS PASS THE TIME. OVER ALL GOOD PROFESSOR.
                
                   During the class, Prof. didn't seem to be prepared and was confused. He went back and forth with practice problems which made a tough material even more confusing. There was a Grad Student sitting upfront who had to pitch in several times to help Prof. teach the material. I think, the student did a better job of teaching than the professor himself.
                
                   
                
                   This instructor does not teach anything at all. Students with no interest on learning loved him.
                
                   Dr. Elam is amazing! Quizzes and test are not bad. I took 5-6 classes with him & he was very supportive, knowledgable and helpful in every class. He truly brings experience and brains to the classroom- he's on of the few teachers who doesn't need to reference the book to remember a concept. He helped a lot in prepping/advising for the CPA exam
                
                   Tests are NOTHING like the lectures. Be prepared to go out looking for your own answers to homeworks and quizzes. He is very knowledgable and skilled in his profession but he doesn't do enough to ensure students success. Only reason why I passed the class is because I bought multiple study guides and books. 
                
                   He is a great person, but his teaching skills are NOT that great. Very unorganized. Does now show grades throughout the semester.  
                
                   must be able to self-teach. NO teaching style; very unorganized. doesnt follow syllabus. grading is a joke. had no clue how I was doing throughout the semester, as he never post grades. gives tons of assignments but you dont know what is being graded or just for "resource". don't pick this one if you can avoid!
                
                   This guy is great. After years of trying to learn accounting, he finally made it click. Hes very laid back but full of knowledge.
                
                   Professor Elam is a good accounting professor. Many students who give him a poor rating come to class unprepared and dont take advantage of the resources he provides. In addition, to his blog (which he frequently discusses in class) he touches on real world topics and problems that many accounting teachers do not. Overall, he is a great teacher
                
                   Dr. Elam is a great teacher if you come to class prepared. HE tells you what is expected from the very beginning. He is not going to waste everyone else's time because you didn't read the assignment or do the homework. He is greatly involved with his students and continually tries to engage them in the world outside of the classroom.
                
                   I was very excited to take this class since I wanted to learn more of Accounting. It was very disappointing seeing that professor Elam does not know what the word teaching really means. Although you do not want to take this professor it seems he is the only one the university has since they do not offer any other options for accounting 3311
                
                   Dr. Elam is knowledge in accounting but he lacks the skills of a teacher. He doesn't know how to explain the material. Test are hard! The material on the exam he never lectured on. You better study on your own! He says to buy the book "schuams intermediate accounting". I've learned more from this book than his lectures.
                
                   Dr. Elam is a really smart man. But he teaches on a level above the average student. He is not organized. His test are really hard. He suggest he will specify what is on the test, but there is no comparison. He loves BLOG. If at all possible avoid this teacher if you want to learn about accounting. He forgets to put grades in the grad book.
                
                   I absolutely love Accounting. I was so excited to take this class! The first day of class he talked himself up.  I regret taking him.  This guy is a joke. He is unorganized and would rather talk about his stupid blog than important things. The man knows a lot about accounting, but nothing about being a teacher.  DO NOT TAKE HIM
                
                   Very nice teacher but im afraid he was by far the worst proffessor I have ever had. Highly unorganized and does not perform very good lectures that prepare you for the test. His test are very hard and you are practically on your own as far as studying. I learned nothing from him. I would avoid taking him at all cost.
                
                   Mr. Elam is a great guy, with a lot of experience to share, but I'm afraid his accounting class was chaotic. The problems he worked out in class were only somewhat related to the test material, and getting him to elaborate on problems felt like pulling teeth! Avoid this prof. if you can or be prepared to teach yourself from the book.
                
                   For accounting majors, Prof. Elam provides a great deal. He teaches his class from the textbook and explains the real world applications that are not in the book. He also offers a lot of good advice on starting an accounting career and provides a blog to help understand the day-to-day changes in accounting and up-coming CPA gatherings.
                
                   He is great professor. He is clear about the work and states that we need to start studying immediately. He does not curve grades, you get what you earn. He explains problems on the board and is very helpful will tutor you or a group, you just need to ask him. He even does tutoring the day before a test.
                
                   This teacher is interesting. Yes he gives alot of work and test are hard but, he works with you. Loves to talk about the movies and other accounting materials. Very informative. Good guy
                
                   Avoid this guy if possible. Intermediate accounting is difficult and requires a lot of time to study. This guy requires a book report and lots of articles to read and blog about which limits the time available to study what is relevant to the course.
                
                   Love this teacher! He is really funny and super easy. Just do the homework and tests are you will pass. He is pretty lenient and tests are really easy. I would definitely take him again!
                
                   Prof. Chopra has been by far one of the best accounting professors I have taken. He relates every accounting situation with real life examples. His priority is for you to understand the material. If you attend class and work on the given assignments you can make an easy A.
                
                   Awesome professor!! Show up & do the work you will get an A.. Very willing to help. Very funny. Relates reality to lectures to help u better understand the concept.  
                
                   I took him as a hybrid class, very very easy to understand, you must attend class because he has an attendance grade, but just pay attention and you will get an A
                
                   fairly easy, very helpful, homework every week. He reviews every exam he gives you. Just do your homework and all exams and you should be okay
                
                   I like Ms.CV, she is a great teacher. She is very helpful and understanding. She works with you on your grades to let you know where your at.
                
                   Ms. CV is unclear when she is teaching. She usually says &quot;uhh&quot; alot. Accounting is a hard subject to teach, and even harder when the exams are SUPER HARD. She allows you to use a 4x6 notecard on the exam, but doesn't really help at all. You do homework online.  She is very understanding though.
                
                   Lots of work is required, but she is very helpful and understanding.
                
                   Dr. Ariail was a wonderful teacher. He is a teacher that everyone wants to have. Dr. Arial has recently left Texas A&M and everyone MISSES him. He will give you the best lecture and a clear understanding of what he is teaching. I would recommend him for any class. Easy going professor, he brings excellent real life senerio into the class.  :)
                
                   JUST DO YOUR WORK AND YOU CAN ACE THE CLASS
                
                   Awesome teacher! He is by far the best teacher I have ever had, and by far the best this school has, and probably ever will see. He comes highly recommended, as you will walk away with a better understanding of the subject, and as for me, have a higher standard of living after taking his Ethics course. If you have the chance, take his courses!
                
                   By far the BEST instructor I have ever had in my academic quest. He is the most helpful and even though he has not been teaching long, you would think he has been doing it for years. He is definitely a natural. Huge asset to Texas A&M Kingsville-SA! Any course taught by him comes HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
                
                   Don't take her if you're a Bus major. Shes easy but you wont learn anything from her. 
                
                   She is a great professor and willing to help you. She posts study guides on black board they are the same TYPE of questions as on the test some are the exact same others change a little but its a good start to studying for her tests.
                
                   GREAT TEACHER! Love her class
                
                   Great professor! She is interesting and very sweet. Lectures include a lot of examples that help studying and doing homework a piece of cake!
                
                   Great professor. Very easy to understand and very willing to help. I had her for 2301 and 2302.  Lots of extra credit.  Thorough tests.  No quizzes. Makes note taking simple.  Works out a ton of problems. Appreciates lots of interaction in class.
                
                   teaches out of every corner of the book.  Study day and night and you will get an A.  She does drop lowest grade and gives attendance points.
                
                   nice teacher, makes good notes and tells you what to study for the test. requires 8 hours comm service and gives you chance for extra cred.
                
                   The class if difficult but manageable.  Prior accounting experiance is helpful.  2301 and 2302 are not very related b/c 01 is financial and 02 is managerial.
                
                   She is so nice and understanding, plus she gives tons of extra credit so there is no way you can fail. She is funny too.
                
                   good professor
                
                   I had him for both 2301&2301 and he's one of the best acct teachers I've EVER had. He actually cares and is pretty down to earth about it all. DEFINITELY recommend! I wish he taught upper level classes too.
                
                   Loved this guy! Super fun, friendly, young, attractive.
                
                   Wonderful professor! Really cared about the students understanding the material. Used many in class practices that helped with homework and tests. Allowed cheat sheet for test!
                
                   Honestly, The first day we came into class he was bragging about how many students drop his class and how big his failure rate is. And he was right. We started off with 50 plus students and on the final were down to no more than 18. He is hard, maybe next time they should find a teacher who actually cares about the $600 students spend.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   First day of class she was late, and came in with a bad attitude. Lecture had no structure and she is anal about how she wants papers turned in and when passing out material she says "Did I say talk amoungst yourselfs!!I thought to myself are we in highschool?  This is an upper level college course.
                
                   Class consisted of hours of pointless rambling and often rude remarks. Poured hours and hours of homework and reading(literally 10-20hrs per week). The worst part is the homework doesn't help you learn anything and she NEVER provides any feedback or grades on anything.
                
                   3 test w bonus, simulation, some extra credit, some homewok collection. Overall nice prof, but boring. Didnt really learn much from her, had more luck reading. Easy class just do work.
                
                   I Loved her. she made it as easy as possible considering its boring n all. She gives take home quizzes and problems online but they help soo much with the test. Plus the review is the test but different numbers! that helped big time. then the final 1 part is take home well she even helped me with that is quick to respond 2 emails too VERY HELPFUL.
                
                   Horrible teacher, rude, and hated her job!  I have had accounting classes before and never have I had a teacher like her.  Hard to understand, teaches out of her head, doesn't go over test after they are returned, moves really fast, and doesn't go over homework problems
                
                   Professor Polansky gives the most clear lectures! Very helpful, and goes at a pace that helps you stay on track, but not too slow to get you bored in class. Mid-term and final were both take home, maybe because the class was once a week. Highly recommend taking Polanksy. Great class for both auditing, and accounting
                
                   I love Mrs. Polansky.  Three word take home final!!!!The best accounting teacher at TMUCC
                
                   Professor Polansky was an amazing Professor. I have taken Accounting before and found it difficult. Professor Polansky made it easy to understand. We had take home quizzes, Powerpoint lectures and Homework was online as well. I highly recommend taking her for Accounting.
                
                   There are some things she makes clear and other things that she makes very difficult to understand. I do prefer this class over any other as there are only 6 homework assignments due on the last day of class and four quizzes the whole semester
                
                   I took accounting with another teacher here and had to drop because I could not follow, she moved too fast. Polansky taught at a PERFECT pace. She made everything very clear and easy to understand. She did tons of practice on the board to make sure you got every step. I definitely recommend her, especially if you're not good with accounting!
                
                   nice guy. goes kinda fast while teaching so you have to pay attention. reading the book helps alot. you must study for tests!!
                
                   Not for the squeemish, hes hard but fair and all his tests are multiple guess. If your not an accounting major dont take it as an elective youll be lost. Overall I would recommend him above Hall.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This guy just can't teach.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Class wasn't too hard, and he's an extremely nice guy.  Kind of soft spoken, but if you sit close to the front, it's not too bad.  I definitely reccomend him.
                
                   Great Teacher. Lots of fun.
                
                   Dr. Chambers is a great professor! She cares about you learning the material, but will not baby you through any part of the class. If you can't handle tax, then don't feel like you are a full accountant. Tax is complex and requires effort, and if you care about learning, she will definitely help out. She is one of the best at TAMUCC!
                
                   I enjoyed going to Mrs. Chambers' class and I feel that I learned a lot. She is very helpful if you have any sort of question & gives test reviews before each test. She does NOT dress like street walker. Wears professional clothing, nothing distracting. I also do not believe that she is &quot;full&quot; of herself. She's a nice, approachable professor.
                
                   Nice person. Nice to look at. Very full of herself, she has to be the best in the room. You will learn very little about tax in this class. Tests are way beyond her lectures and skills practice. Somewhat fair.
                
                   Dr Chambers presents the acct lectures in a style that makes sense.  She starts out talking about how to do the steps, then explains the big picture. This keeps you from feeling overwhelmed.  She also has great enthusiasm. 5 out of 5!
                
                   very excellent teacher, the best there is.
                
                   If you are not an Accounting major, stay away. She teaches as if you already know the material and doesn't explain much; instead she goes through problems assuming everyone understands. She does give extra credit though and even some take home tests. Getting a decent grade isn't difficult but I know I won't take anything away from the class.
                
                   Great Accountant, horrible teacher. Do Not take her if you are planning on having help learning the material
                
                   Good teacher as long as you're not a slacker!
                
                   What a stuck up, pompious, narcisitic butthole who married money. However, shes a brilliant tax accountant and I would recommend her class over Tillinger, she covers way to much way to fast. She gives you tax forms to do online and tells you absolutley zilch about them, as well as the book does. She talks about herself and her kids most of the time coming to class dressed like a streetwalker and flashing jewelry while staring down her nose at the rest of us lowley students. But she doesnt give F's if U try.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   she was unhelpful and full of herself...she never really answered questions and really didn't care about the students...i asked for help and she told me NO!
                
                   She's a b@#$%.  Not helpful at all. Stuck on herself, she doesnt have a very effective teaching method b/c she teachers by her personal experiences rather than by the book. Her exams have nothing to do with her notes or lecture. She should not ne a teacher.
                
                   She is not very helpful, full of herself, and she contradicts herself and puts the blame on you
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Smith knows her way around the Business Law! What was I thinking taking this course over a 5 week summer class - OUCH! however, she structured it to work, get in the critical things and even offered us additional help that we would need for CPA exams!
                
                   Amazing professor!!! Very smart, friendly and works with students. She made this class very interesting with real world examples in class. It helps a lot! Her quizzes and exams have some trick questions, but as long as you read the chapters and listen to her lectures you will do fine. Take her class!
                
                   Very smart and funny professor. Her exams do have some trick questions, but as long as you read the chapters you'll do fine on the quizzes and exams. The lectures were basically her power points she sends you. She can get off on tangents with real world examples to cases in the book. Easy to get a B in this class, hard to get an A.
                
                   5 week business law class. Brutal! Professor Smith laid out the class very well and covered an amazing amount of material in a short time! Tests were hard. Discussion posts were many. 
                
                   Case studies were helpful.
                
                   Took her Business Law class online during a summer 5 week session. Class was difficult due to the volume of material to be covered in a short period of time however she had the course laid out in a way that was easy to work through and somewhat ahead if desired. Tests were difficult but passable as long as you had read. Required discussions and HW
                
                   Amazing professor and knows her stuff.  Gives real world examples in class and is up front about what you need to know.  
                
                   professor is hard
                
                   tough class
                
                   Very great professor! Most of the quizes and test come from assigned homework! If you do your homework and read you will Def pass this class.
                
                   Very difficult class. She answered most of the questions asked, but not in a way that helped clarify. Often included material on tests and quizzes that had not been covered in class. Either that or she intentionally tries to trick you on questions.
                
                   I was not interested in auditing until I took this class. Professor very friendly and works with students. I learned more in this class than in any other classes. Tough and hard work, but fair in grading. Drops a quiz. Very helpful. If you study hard and attend class you will get A or B.
                
                   But beware of her. She comes off as friendly but she is not. Her tests are tricky and it seems her goal is to get one over on students. She says you can drop one quiz but all she does is add a few points to a low score. Not the same. Her lectures are clear because she reads from the book. Many quiz questions come from old CPA exams. Be careful.
                
                   This class had a lot of work. You would have to EARN your grade. That being said, Audit material is EASY. READ the textbook and do homeworks. You will be good. She drops one quiz. Her lectures are VERY helpful and crystal clear. READ the text thoroughly and you would be finee on the quizzes. Quizzes can be tricky though.made an A. Would take again.
                
                   Really good Professor. Her class wasn't the easiest, but if you study, you will make a good grade. I found myself gaining more knowledge in her class than in any other class. I would definitely recommend her.
                
                   She is the meanest professor I ever had to deal with. I do not recommend her for anybody at all.
                
                   She really was awesome.  Like the person below said, if you do what she asks, you will, not only get a good grade, but you will learn more than if you had taken the same course with any other professor.  If you want to learn... TAKE HER CLASS!
                
                   she has 3 tests..her tests an online but a little difficult for me i do not like to take another class with her,, i do not recommended to others too..
                
                   She is very good. If you do your reading and follow review you will make staight A+.
                
                   Tests and assignments are fairly graded and I enjoyed this class a great deal.
                
                   To confirm what has already mentioned, she IS VERY disorganized.  Always late to response to emails. Suggestion- instead of trying to be funny she should concentrate on teaching and being helpful. She wrote her lifestory in the Online announcemet.  I really DO NOT care about her Hippie Life. I was in the class to learn Accounting.
                
                   She is wildly disorganized but very funny, smart and can break down managerial accounting VERY well. Stay on her if you need a schedule and you will do fine.
                
                   I enjoyed this class. Professor works with students to help and responds quickly to questions. Would highly recommend over the other accounting professors.
                
                   First year teaching. Not really organized. Lecture is word for word power points. I think she will get better with experience. Needs to take control of the class a little better. Only about 15% of the class ever showed up. I came every day and made an A. We didnt go over T accounts and that kind of worries me. But easy A nonetheless.
                
                   Doesnt' know how to lecture, but it's her first year to teach!
                
                   Did not have much interaction, you basically read the text book.  It is a lot of homework, group cases, black board discussions, 2 exams(multiple choice and short essays), and a final paper.  Be prepared to read and write a lot.
                
                   Group project is worth 40% of the total grade.  Only two test midterm and final, but be prepared to spend time analyzing 10K reports.  If you get into a good working group for the project you should be fine.  Professor was not very clear on what was expected of us within the writing of the project, but was a fairly easy grader.
                
                   She is flexible with due dates. Exams are nothing like the reviews, luckily there are only two of them. Group projects are a part of your main grade. She is nice, but definitely knows her material. I would say it was easier than I thought. 
                
                   I was going thru some tough times, but she was like okay I help you out and work with you.  At the end of the semester, when I saw my grade I was like I did everything you asked me to do to catch up.  Lecture was confusing, all she does is read straight from powerpoint presentation given by the textbook.  I took another professor, and understood it
                
                   Horrible!! Would not recommend taking this professor. Unorganized. No clarity whatsoever! Soft spoken and it's annoying! Busy work. Took this class face-to-face & wish I would have taken it online. Felt like it was a waste of my time going to class. She lectured about 5 times the rest of the classes were spent working on assignments & group project
                
                   Prof. Hayek is a great instructor. The other raters must not have tried at all. She pushes you to learn your material, but is very generous in her grading and extremely knowledgeable. Show up to class, show interest, you'll learn the material. The tests are very similar to the reviews. By far my favorite instructor at the university.
                
                   Took this online, never even bought the textbook. There was a group assignment that was fairly straightforward, takes up most of the semester, and ends up being your "Final". I hate accounting, so I was just glad to pass and get it over with!
                
                   She is the worst teacher to have and she has no idea what she is doing. If I did not have to take her I would not have. I got an A but that is because I studied a lot.
                
                   Professor Hayek has been one of my favorite professors. She was extremely helpful in & out of class.
                
                   SHE IS VERY HELPFUL IS ASK. SHE SEEMS NEW TO THE TEACHING GAME BUT SHE IS VERY KNOWLEDGABLE
                
                   The worst teacher... do not take her if you can. She is not helpful at all.
                
                   Dr. Haskin makes accounting interesting.  He offers prerecorded voice over power point lectures and integrates relevant accounting examples to prove his point.  Tests are clear cut and mirror quizzes.  You have one major paper at the end of the semester but he gives clear instructions on his expectations.  Great teacher and great class!
                
                   Virginia Fullwood seems to take her class very seriously. I'm sure in the private sector she was a great accounting who really knew there stuff. However, she struggles tremendously at teaching and explaining concepts in class. For this reason many students struggle. Her tests are very hard for ACT 321. I strongly advise against this professor.
                
                   This professor knows her accounting, but she does not understand how to be a professor. All semester, not one single grade posted. First, each section was suppose to be graded. Seemed as if the professor became lazy and changed it up to at the end would be one lump sum grade I did everything asked, but it's the having no grades thing sucks.
                
                   Professor Fullwood is very knowledgeable in her field of Accounting.  With that said, she does not keep up with grading, and emails are returned monthly as a class email addressing global issues.  This is a tough online class, and it is very important to work well with your group members.
                
                   Fullwood is one of the best professors I have ever had. She knows so much about accounting and you can learn so much from her. I was sick at the beginning of the semester and she was very understanding. But of course you have to work hard too!  Other students just want to pass and not learn anything. I will be taking her again soon! 
                
                   Fullwood is probably a very good accountant.  Not a good teacher.  Her approach is very clinical and detached.  She doesn't seem able to keep up with grading or feedback as many others have noted about this teacher.  Her methods are outdated.  Don't take this teacher if you can help it.
                
                   Fullwood knows her accounting...I'll give her that much. But she does not grade assignments in a timely manner. The week before finals we had no idea what we made on the previous two exams or any homework grades. She holds class lives which are helpful but not knowing your grade for the whole semester is so irritating. Take her at your own risk. 
                
                   Trust me you can't learn anything she doesn't know how to teach accounting.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HER ONLINE. I was shut out of 2 of my exams on WileyPlus and she tried to make it seems as if I didn't attempt to take the exams at all.
                
                   Work really hard and work all the extra problems you can and you will probably learn a lot and do very well.  Unfortunately there are way too many people who really don't want to put any serious effort into this course and deserve to fail.
                
                   The book is the problem in this class. Took online not hard but the book is not clear. She grades far but takes a while to get grades back. She does class lives which help but sometimes not with the problems given. Just turn in something for homework and you will get credit.
                
                   Great lady but yes she is difficult. The material is something you have to study but make sure you do the homework and ask as many questions as possible. Her test are hard but all she wants is for her students to know the material. All i can say is study and ask question. She loves to help.
                
                   She is a wonderful teacher! She is very helpful and understanding you just have to ask. Just be sure you do your homework even though she is not going to ask for it. I feel she just wants her students to learn about accounting so that they can take the CPA test.
                
                   This professor does not respond to emails promptly. She does not grade in a timely fashion. Over half of the assignments for the entire semester were not graded until after the final. If you were doing something completely wrong in homework, you had no way of knowing it. What if there were questions on the final regarding that topic&#63;
                
                   I have emailed her many times, and have only gotten one response which did not even answer my question. I asked for help, and she told me she would explain it in class next time when the  homework was due for a grade before that. If you are looking for a helpful teacher, look elsewhere. She is not horrible at teaching, just not helpful.
                
                   Great professor and willing to help if you ask. Just read the book and show that your are trying to help yourself and she will help you. Quiz after every chapter helps alot, and she gives you a chance to get a perferct score on the quiz if you do bad.
                
                   So long you do your assignments you will do fine in the class. The class on line was time demanding and very independent. You will need to work out all the problems for yourself or participate with the class colleagues. I had fun learning this class' material.
                
                   I'm taking this class online. We have 3 weeks of the semester left; she hasn't finished grading the first week's assignments. You cannot reach her. Several students, including myself, have had difficulties but never receive assistance from her. We were to have weekly quizzes. Haven't had them in awhile. She's not attentive in the least.
                
                   She is a very fair and awesome teacher.  I have learned so much from her.  I love how she dresses also.
                
                   If Accounting is your major this is an outstanding professor. She tries very hard but the volume of material she must cover slams most beginners in Accounting. You must know Excel before taking this course. The textbook is changing is it needed to. Her tests are hard if you don't do the homework and study, or get behind. Hard teacher, and fair.
                
                   She is not much of a teacher.  She comes to the class expecting the class to already know.  Her test NEVER matched what she &quot;taught.&quot;  Didn't seem to learn much either because she was so confusing.  AVOID AT ALL COSTS!
                
                   The class: There were 2 homework assignments and a quiz due almost every week, but they really helped me learn the material. The professor: Dr. Duron is an excellent online instructor who is detail oriented.  He writes well and is clear in his writing.  This can be seen in his responses to students' questions and his error-free syllabus.
                
                   His entry level accounting course  is taught entirely through Cengage, which is a different website that has canned videos, homework, and tests.  Professor Duron doesn't really teach the class; Cengage does. Expect a needless mountain of required homework. This class is 90 percent required busy work. Don't take it if you don't have to.
                
                   Great professor. His way of teaching is easy to understand.  Taking his class whenever you can.  You will learn a lot from his class.
                
                   Take his class. He is the best professor because of  his teaching method. Accounting is not easy if you don't know math. His way of solving a hard problem is so easy to follow.  You will learn a lot in his class and be able to get good grade.
                
                   Take this class with Professor Duron.  He is very helpful and answers all your questions about HW and quizes.  There will be graded HWs and quizes for each chapter but you have a second chance to do the quizes.  Two exams.  If you do well on HWs and Quizes you should be very good with the exams.  I would take his class again if he teaches ACCT 525.
                
                   Dr.Duran was consistently available in his virtual office. Responses were usually within 24 hrs. He always gave great feedback to questions and helped with any challenges you might have had. You had 2 chances with quizzes and as long as you did the homework, you would do well on the exams.
                
                   Extremely helpful and responsive to queries. Exam schedules are well laid out and he is flexible when you need to make exceptions due to genuine reasons. Very good class overall
                
                   The professor used a connect site where you completed homeworks and tests. No lecture time, but as you read and worked through the homework the professor was quick to respond to questions. Tests were timed but you had two chances to take them.  The second chance gave you an opportunity to correct mistakes. I would take him again.
                
                   Dr Duron is a brilliant man who facilitates and instructs when asked but otherwise gets out of the way. The pearson software is a plus.
                
                   Take his class if you can. He is very helpful and understanding.
                
                   Great Prof, very attentive and understanding. He uses Myaccountinglab, which is amazing for learning!I'm just not good with accounting.  The quizzes and the homework are easy, the final its a beast!
                
                   Dr. Duron should be your go-to professor for anything related to Accounting. Very responsive and involved in online discussions. He uses MAL, which teaches you accounting much better than any textbook could. The class wasn't easy, but felt easy because you couldn't help but grasp the concepts. Best professor I have every had!
                
                   This was a great class. The textbook was supported by the online My Accounting Lab(MAL). MAL was incredibly helpful and if you completed the MAL practice and homework you can easily do the quizzes and tests. Prof. Duron is very responsive and clear with questions. Class was well organized. Go ahead and take this class!
                
                   HE IS AWESOME! TAKE HIM!! YOU WONT REGRET IT. NEVER TOOK ACCT BEFORE...GOT AN A! ALWAYS THERE. HE WRITES YOU BACL IN UNDER AN HOUR. HE WANTS YOU TO GET AN A and GET SOMETHING OUT OF HIS CLASS!!! ANY CLASS HE TEACHES! TAKE IT!!
                
                   This was a great class. Professor Duron is extrememly helpful. He answers all questions in a timely manner and he really cares. The exams and quizzes are very similar to the homework. The class is a little time consuming but not terribly difficult as far as the course material goes. I would take another class from him.
                
                   Fairly straight forward course.  Put in the time and effort and you'll do well.  Professor is great to work with and willing to help out.  Would recommend for this course.
                
                   I took this class as part of pre-reqs & i think this was worth the money & time spent. Prof is very helpful & makes sure all the questions are answered right away. Clarity, direction & focus are maintained all the way. You end up actually learning a lot from the class. Very much recommended.
                
                   I check often to see if he is teaching ACCT525 because I had such a good experience in ACCT501 with him. VERY helpful. You can take HW/Quizzes more than once to try and get a good grade. Tests are similar to HW/quizzes. Easy if you can make the time to do the work. HIGHLY RECOMMEND!
                
                   I am postponing my graduation just so I can take another online course with this professor. I have never had a professor care so much about my grade and helping me improve, but understand the information as well. He is by far the nicest professor I have ever had.
                
                   I had this class for the Summer II session and it was probably the most demanding class I've ever taken. We went through all but one chapter of the book and had assignments due just about everyday. The class isn't hard, but EXTREMELY time consuming. After finishing that class, I felt like I just gave birth to an elephant! GOOD LUCK!
                
                   This was the worst class I took at TAMUC. He was rude, condescending, threatening, unhelpful, and aloof. He responded to an email I sent with "Isn't that an obvious answer?" When students asked about grading criteria for a project, he deleted the questions from the discussion board. His exams are very long. I self-taught because he did nothing.
                
                   Dr. Chen is the worst professor I have ever had. He berates students for asking questions and responds to emails with sarcasm. It is extremely difficult to do well in a class where the professor refuses to help when you have questions. The tests are not hard if you read your book. However, he grades his projects in an extremely difficult manner.
                
                   Professor would not clarify on assignments. Online class - generally self-taught. Would write several posts on online office lecturing the students for not understanding his assignments but wouldn't help clarify confusion. Would write in all caps. EXTREMELY unprofessional.  Worst teacher I've ever had (literally).
                
                   Absolutely worst prof I've had in my entire college career. He is no help with questions and his tax project is very unclear and confusing as evidenced by MANY student complaints. He recorded his (very brief) lecture vids on Youtube last year and only reads the powerpoint in them. Chen doesn't do a liveinteractive lecture session. Avoid this prof
                
                   You have to be able to learn completely on your own. However she had us learn from Cengage brain-which was the best teacher. Read the book and did practice quizzes and homework on the website-never listened to one of her lectures. Talk to the people in the class if u don't understand form a group
                
                   SHE IS THE WORST. DONT TAKE HER. STAY AWAY FROM HER IF U WANA MAINTAIN UR GPA, SLEEP PEACEFULLY AT NIGHT, AND CONCENTRATE ON OTHER CLASSES - RUN FARRRRR AWAY FROM HER.
                
                   Dr. Burke was great in the online forum, and for a condensed 4 week long class many things were glazed, but the important items remained. She was encouraging and kept motivating us. Slow to grade.
                
                   She gives hw but wont grade them. She gives no quizzes. Her test questions do not coincide with the demo problems. Test 1 is 8 chapters total. Who can retain all those information in 6 weeks? 
                
                   Grade was only based on two tests and a paper, no quizzes or homework.  Lectures were an hour or less but worth listening to as they helped with the exam.  If you read and listen to the lectures, you can easily pass.  Emailed the professor a couple of times and she responded quickly, even on the weekend.
                
                   If you do the homework and read the chapters you will do well.   
                
                   Very dismissive, does not explain course material well, is a "figure it out for yourself" type of professor. Not one that  will inspire you in your career.
                
                   Absolute worst experience with a professor at TAMUC!  Not helpful, does no instruction, dismissive, will not clarify objectives and refuses to support student success.  Horrible instructor!  RUN as fast as you can to another instructor!
                
                   I took her class online. Course involved a midterm and comprehensive final exam and two projects. A memo and a 1040 refund. Class wasn't extremely difficult due to easiness of the projects. My grade suffered do to the high level of difficulty on the exams. Exams were open to all material covered.
                
                   Advanced Managerial Accounting is a hard subject to digest. I have my bachelor's in Accounting, currently studying for the an accounting related certification and was hoping this course would be supplemental to my studying. This professor is not much help. Run if you can. Exams are tough alone and she doesn't provide enough time to take them.
                
                   If you can try and take this class with a professor that actually teaches the course. If you aren't strong in math (like me) and prosper with further tutoring know that she won't be extensively helpful. Also, the tests are RIDICULOUSLY hard since you can't entirely relate it to what you've studied (if at all) and they aren't like the quizzes BEWARE
                
                   Not an easy course to take but teacher really wasn't very helpful. Test were absolutely horribly difficult. She did not teach nor did you work through problems. I would not recommend anyone to take her class if you want to LEARN the subject.
                
                   Great teacher aside from the occasional dismissive attitude. Fast speaker and you have to keep up if want to succeed in her class. Very flexible and smart.
                
                   She is really lazy. Takes monthsss to grade anything.You wont know any of your  grades for months. Speaks reallyyy fast in her live lectures... just wants to end them asap. Just 2 exams which are super hard. No review. One pointless research memo with zero help from her. Overall, a really bad experience. Would never wana tale any class with her.
                
                   Truly interested in teaching the material.  Works very hard to make the class rewarding.
                
                   Very awesome teacher. Teaches the information well. Uses powerpoint which is very helpful. She even sends them to you before class. So my advice is to take her. Read the powerpoints before class. Be respectful and listen to her lectures and you will do well. An added bonus is that she is hot!
                
                   She was an awesome teacher! Always willing to help. Took time out to talk to you after class individually. Powerpoints are good and pretty self explanitory. Overall an awesome teacher. I wish she would teach all the accounting classes.
                
                   really bad teacher.  doesnt know how to teach, it was her first semester teaching in fall07.  cannot explain anything.  if youre a visual learner, take someone else because she does not do any visual examples, just reads ppt's-that i could read by myself...nice person, horrible teacher
                
                   Dr. Baker was an excellent professor who was there whenever you needed her. Mandatory live sessions once every two weeks ( for the most part ) which were very informative and helpful. Would highly recommend her to anyone! Tests ( mid and final were very tough) Grades also consist of participation, homework and a group project  
                
                   Very little clear direction given. Tests did not resemble homework. Wasn't able to use our final exam scores bc of issues w ProctorU. Great lectures, great course material. Clarify and direction found wanting.
                
                   Dr. Baker is one of the more attentive instructors I've had during my college career.  Always responsive and gives great feedback and instructions.  Her follow-up is awesome.  Be sure to take her classes.
                
                   Professor Baker is fantastic! Her lectures are fun and concise. She explains things very clearly and thoroughly. She grades very fairly and communicates with students regularly. I hate accounting but she made the class very tolerable. The material is hard, let's not get things mixed up, but she'll ease the pain.
                
                   Dr. Baker makes this course as easy as possible. She breaks things down and is always available to answer questions. She has a very pleasant attitude and makes hard concepts easier to grasp. There is mandatory online check-ins, homework, quizzes, 2 exams (final and midterm), and a group project.
                
                   Dr. Baker is awesome! Very helpful and promt with email responses. Sit through the online chat sessions and she goes through the power points step by step. Weekly homework takes up some time but not too difficult. This class is not an easy A buy any means but if you put in the work and learn the material you should get an A.
                
                   I really liked Dr. Baker. She followed along with the text and gave great lectures. Homework, midterm, final, group project and critique. Homework was in online web access. Ace it to keep your grade high. Midterm and final were created by the Professor and a little harder. Group Project - don't be worried about it. It was fine. Take this class!
                
                   Many homework problems, but unlimited chances to submit them online, so you get 100% of the credit.  Group project which is decently easy, but time consuming.  Exams can be challenging.  Given that this is accounting, I can't really complain, Professor Baker was very helpful and great at responding to emails; she clearly cares about her students.
                
                   Fantstico teacher. She taught online class and had a great attitude doing it. She's very personable and quick to help. Keep up with the hw and put in the time and you'll do great. Acct is not a fun subject by any means but she made it bareable. Would take any other class she offers in a heartbeat and recommend to others for sure!
                
                   This teacher was straight forward. Her exams went along with her lectures. I would recommend taking her class.
                
                   (Online Course) Dr. Baker is so helpful she conducts the Class live in Illuminate once a week and the other ones are prerecording so you have the lectures, the materials, the powerpoints, also she requires homework in Connect that is all due before the exam. I was afraid to take this 100% online but she made taught well. Highly Recommended!
                
                   I would recommend her to take for ACCT 525. She is willing to help and grades fair. Her exams follow her lecture and the homework.
                
                   I would definitely recommend taking Pamela Baker. I was no good at Accounting but she makes it easy to understand. She even let me in her class when it was full. She is a great professor and you will succeed if you give her your best effort. You can't go wrong with her.
                
                   I would definitely recommend taking Pamela Baker. I'm not good at accounting but she makes it easy to understand.  She has everything you would look for in a great professor.
                
                   This is by far the best professor I have ever had!
                
                   She makes an intro to a difficult subject kinda easy with the review material avaliable prior to the test
                
                   She is a very kind teacher and she wants to help, but the tests are crazy hard. Basically, you have to go to the Help Desk 24/7 and do every problem that she gives for homework (even though she doesn't take it up) Be prepared to work hard!!!
                
                   She makes everything seem easy in class and the tests are extremely difficult. She will help you however she can but you pretty much have to do ALL the problems you can get your hands on if you want a decent grade.
                
                   Dr. Sharp is a very good professor. He truly cares about his students and wants you to succeed. His class is very difficult, you need to read the text book and do the practice problems he assigns. Attendance is mandatory but he clearly outlines his expectations and is upfront about the difficulty of the course.
                
                   A very, friendly, high quality professor. No, his class isn't easy. No, you can't get by without doing the homework. Yes, his tests are very difficult. No, he doesn't do a large curve. Yes, you will learn a ton. He explains the material very well and is always willing to answer questions. YOU MUST EARN YOUR GRADE. His class will make you a man.
                
                   If you don't know the material well, don't take Sharp. He's a nice person, but he believes in each person earning their own grade. There is no extra credit opportunities in his class. You need to show up to class almost knowing the material already because he does nothing but lecture and goes really fast. He is too smart to teach. Not very patient.
                
                   
                
                   
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This is a hard class. I didn't start going to her office until the end of the semester, however Mrs. Moore seemed open and happy to help. She is extremely nice and tells you EXACTLY what is needed to pass the class. The tests are common, long and very difficult, but nothing that a good student can't overcome.
                
                   Accounting was hard, but if you actually apply your time and seek help by utilizing your resources, you should be good. I loved attending Prof Moore's class. Exams are tough and she had a small curve at the end.
                
                   Accounting is hard, but she is super helpful and willing to work with you. You just have to be willing to put effort into the class. 
                
                   She's a nice person, but not a great prof. Her lectures are super rushed and are often times, confusing. Accounting was hard for me and having her as a prof did not help. I would go to her office hours on a weekly basis asking on what I can do to get better and she pretty much always said to me, "Accounting is not for everyone, don't worry."  wut
                
                   No problems. Pretty straightforward classteacher. I never asked for individual help, but it seemed like she was quite willing to give it
                
                   She's a great person, really. Her lectures are super boring, rushed and somewhat confusing. I am not saying don't take her, but if you have the chance of taking someone else, take Knopp or Barrett. 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher, very nice, very helpful.
                
                   She is great! We have common tests but for the final the different accounting professors write their own. Her's was easy and she is really sweet and pretty :)
                
                   Professor Benjamin is a great man--he really cares about getting to know his students. I took him for Honors ACCT 229 and he dedicated a week of school to invite all the students to lunch to get to know us on a personal level. Because he is older, lectures tended to drag on (Tue/Thur class) but he always gave us a 5 minute break in the middle.
                
                   Accounting 230 is a very doable class and Allen adds an element of fun that definitely isn't there otherwise. While it is challenging everything you need to learn is very clearly outlined for you. Ms. Allen definitely makes the class better!
                
                   This is a hybrid class so you go to class 1 day a week and watch videos to learn the rest of the material. Homework isn't bad if you stay on top of it, but exams can be difficult. Grades are weighted in your favor: I made 2 B's and 1 A on the exams and only need an 86 on the final for an A in the class.
                
                   This was a tough class for me, mainly because I don't like how we only have one class a week then everything else online. You HAVE to study for this class, I haven't made above a 70 on an exam because I keep assuming they'll be easy to wing and they're not! Keep up with the lecture videos and online hw and you should be fine! She's a great prof.
                
                   Nice teacher; explains things well. Class is set up strange -you only go to lecture once a week and then you do a bunch of online work outside of class, which I hated. Overall a fairly easy class, tests get progressively harder through the semester so try to do especially good on the first few tests. Doing the recommended homework was helpful.
                
                   Great teacher, Smoking hot lol, but for real she is a great prof, who cares about her students success
                
                   Very nice teacher.  Need to attend class and keep up with homework to be successful.  Tests fall on same schedule as several other classes.  Hard to find time to study for all.
                
                   She's a good teacher and is enthusiastic about what she teaches.  She's also very amicable.  The class isn't too terribly difficult if you attend class.
                
                   Great teacher! Since it's a weed out class it is very challenging as well...
                
                   good
                
                   This Class is easy compared to 229 like put you to sleep easy
                
                   very boring!
                
                   Awesome professor. Loved the course. So informational and helpful. Be ready to read, study, do homework, and do a project. All of the work is worth the time. This class is worth taking and worth your money.
                
                   Very clear and explanatory during lectures. However accounting (in my opinion) is just boring, so there wasn't much excitement. but if you ask questions or need help she is always happy to assist
                
                   Drops an exam and several homeworks
                
                   She knows the material, but when she lectures she sounds completely confused. You will read the entire book. I took this during the summer so there was nothing online, but she relied heavily on the online material. The way she presents the material it should be an online class. She is a really nice person and seems to genuinely care about students.
                
                   Alright.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She has really boring and not clear lectures but she is really nice and she helps you out if you want to make a good grade. She does some extra credits also.
                
                   Good luck.
                
                   Really nice, but class was pretty boring :/ She mostly just reads the chapter which makes it hard to pay attention. I would recommend a differrent teacher if you're new to accounting. If you already know the basic concepts however, you would probably do okay in her class.
                
                   Dr. Pulliam would &quot;go the extra mile&quot; for you if she could.  The class subject matter is hard, however.  Be prepared to study and work problems on your own.
                
                   She is the best teacher I have ever had, the smartest, and also the nicest. She is so nice that she should give me an A. Please!!!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Enjoyed her class. Allowed students to talk about current issues, not just what was in the book.
                
                   I really enjoyed his teaching style. He tries to make everyone understand and be excited about accounting. Average an 80 on his tests you can make an A.
                
                   I really enjoyed Mr. Clark. Teaching for him is for the joy to give back and not for a paycheck so he genuinely cares for his students and the knowledge he gives them about accounting. I definitely recommend his class. He has several options for the way he lectures in order to help his students succeeded
                
                   Great professor! He incorporates every learning style into his lectures to help everyone understand accounting. 
                